Part 3. Chapter 121 to 138.

“Tsk.”

Daemon clicked his tongue softly as he examined Liv’s leg, now dirty and smeared with mud. Despite Liv’s insistence that she could walk alone since she wasn’t injured, only stuck in the mud, Daemon intentionally ignored her. He carried Liv back to the carriage, where the servant accompanying them found a towel from their belongings.

“It’s dirty; I can just clean it outside.”

“Must you?”

Liv seemed unwilling to soil the fine interior of the carriage with mud. But, as with her other requests, Daemon ignored her plea and sat her down in the carriage. Up close, he could see that not only her leg but also the hem of her skirt, stained with grass, was smeared with mud.

Seeing the waiting servant ready to assist with cleaning, Daemon gave him a stern look and extended his hand. The servant, understanding the unspoken command, handed the towel to Daemon and then stepped back.

Bending over to wipe off the dirt himself, Daemon startled Liv.

“Why would you do that, Marquis?”

Daemon frowned upon hearing Liv’s muttering. “Do you intend to show your leg to that servant?”

“No! I meant there’s no need to be served. I can do this myself!”

Naturally, Daemon paid her words no attention. He firmly grasped her muddy ankle, moving it around to clean the area. His gloves became soiled in the process.

“Does it hurt anywhere?”

“No. More importantly, Marquis, I can—”

“You know that I can’t resist seizing any opportunity to hold you, right?”

Daemon, still holding her ankle, glanced up at Liv.

“You’ve experienced it enough by now.”

For a moment, Liv seemed at a loss for words. She steadied her voice as she looked down at him.

“I know you like rolling around with me. But that doesn’t justify you stepping in here. You dislike dirty things.”

“Of course, I do.”

Daemon responded indifferently as he shifted his attention back to her ankle.

“But if I don’t check it myself, you won’t think it’s worth telling me even if you have a slight sprain.”

“Ugh.”

Daemon pressed on a spot on her ankle, causing Liv to let out a small groan. It seemed she hadn’t expected the pain herself, as her face flushed with embarrassment.

“No, it’s not that I didn’t want to tell you—I really didn’t know. It’s not a big deal.”

“What?”

Daemon ignored her words and looked to the side as the servant brought a bowl of water. Setting the bowl on the carriage floor, Daemon used the towel to wipe away the mud.

“You should take off the stocking.”

“I can do it myself.”

Her tone was almost pleading now. Daemon reluctantly handed the towel to Liv, who quickly moved to the far side of the carriage to distance herself from him.

She seemed to expect Daemon to wait outside while she managed on her own. Daemon gladly closed the carriage door, but instead of waiting outside, he opted to stay with her.

Liv opened her mouth, then shut it, her expression resigned. Cleaning up was much easier now that the large clumps of mud had been wiped off and she could use the damp towel to finish.

Liv tried to remove the stocking without hiking up her skirt, but soon realized it was impossible. With a sigh, she lifted the hem of her skirt, revealing the smooth curve of her leg, which had previously been hidden beneath the muddy part.

Once she unclipped the garter belt holding the stocking in place, taking it off was quick work. After tossing the dirty stocking aside, Liv hesitated before reaching for the stocking on her other leg. She seemed to think it was better to take off both stockings rather than wear only one.

Seeing Liv awkwardly pressing herself into the corner, Daemon rose abruptly, only to pause as he noticed his dirty gloves. His sudden movement startled Liv, who froze, her eyes wide.

Under her gaze, Daemon slowly removed his gloves and placed them on the empty seat next to him. Liv watched with a strange expression as he discarded the gloves.

Regardless of her gaze, Daemon picked up the wet towel again. He held her exposed foot and carefully cleaned the mud-streaked areas on her ankle and heel—places Liv hadn’t yet gotten to.

The cool dampness made Liv shiver slightly, but she didn’t try to stop him as she had before. Perhaps she’d finally realized that trying to argue with Daemon was futile.

“The heel of your shoe is twisted. If you keep wearing it, it’ll break completely. We’ll have to cancel today’s walk.”

After meticulously wiping every speck of dirt off her ankle and shin, Daemon pushed the dirty towel and bowl towards the door. Liv watched Daemon quietly until that moment, her bare leg still resting in his grasp.

Daemon rubbed his fingers over her now-clean ankle and shin before finally letting go. He lowered her skirt back down to cover her bare leg, then half-opened the carriage door and handed the bowl and towel to the servant.

“If you want to come back, I’ll bring you here whenever you wish.”

Daemon turned around, wondering if Liv might be disappointed.

“…What’s so funny?”

Seeing Liv’s face, Daemon tilted his head. Though faint, a smile was visible on her lips. It wasn’t exactly a joyful smile, but it was still a smile nonetheless.

When Daemon asked, Liv touched her lips as if she hadn’t realized she was smiling.

“Did my actions amuse you?”

“No, Marquis, I wasn’t laughing at you. Rather…”

Liv quickly denied his words and blinked slowly, her green eyes thoughtful as they wandered.

“It would be more accurate to say that I’m laughing at myself.”

Her voice sounded bitter and self-deprecating, as if she were reproaching herself.

“There’s nothing to be ashamed of just because your foot got stuck in the mud.”

“The first time is just a mistake.”

“Hmm?”

“But stepping into the same mud twice isn’t a mistake, is it?”

Liv’s voice carried an uncharacteristic twisted mockery.

“It’s foolishness.”

She was clearly mocking herself. It wasn’t hard to see that she wasn’t just upset about stepping in the mud.

Was she unhappy about the situation earlier, when she had to rely on Daemon for help?

As this thought crossed Daemon’ mind, his heart sank a little. She was always looking for an opportunity to tell him to return to Buerno, and Daemon, who was more sensitive to her mood shifts than anyone else, couldn’t help but feel affected.

But what could he do if she disliked it? If it happened again, he would make the same choice as before.

“Then just foolishly keep stepping into the mud.”

Daemon’ blunt words caught Liv’s attention.

“I’ll always be here to brush off the dirt.”

Liv’s eyes widened. Her tightly pursed lips seemed to be holding something back, and her expression turned strained as she stared at him before lowering her gaze.

“…Let’s just go back to the mansion.”

In the end, they finished their short outing without even opening the picnic basket.

 



 

“Testify in person…”

A summons arrived, stating that if Daemon wanted to achieve meaningful results from putting Lady Malte on trial, he needed to testify himself that he had been insulted.

Daemon tapped his fingertips against the bookshelf. It seemed Luzia was determined not to bear the shame alone.

Attending court wasn’t particularly difficult, though it was a nuisance. Unlike Luzia, Daemon wasn’t someone who cared about maintaining a refined appearance.

But now the situation was unique. He still had no intention of leaving Liv and departing from Adelinde.

“What if I don’t attend?”

“Without you, Charles won’t be able to bring Lady Malte to trial.”

“Even if we put pressure on Malte?”

Instead of answering, Adolf placed a letter on the desk. “It’s from Cardinal Calliope.”

Daemon didn’t need to read the contents to understand the cardinal’s intention. With the Gratia selection approaching, the message could only mean one thing.

“He’s telling me to back off now that I’ve done enough.”

[Should the entire country be thrown into chaos over just one mistress? Your anger has been sufficiently conveyed to everyone, so let’s leave it at that. It would be embarrassing to antagonize the great nobles over such a trivial matter.]

In summary, the letter urged compromise, emphasizing that a head-on confrontation would only lead to mutual ruin.

“Isn’t it absurd? All I did was mention Malte and Eleonore’s names in the newspaper a few times.”

Daemon’ cynical muttering made Adolf give an awkward smile. No one knew better than Adolf how much ridicule the two families had faced due to those few mentions in the press.

Through this incident, Daemon had not only created enmity with the two families but had also strained relations with other noble families close to them. Even if he planned to abstain from social activities, it was not advantageous to increase the number of enemies needlessly.

Therefore, the cardinal’s intervention came at an opportune time.

“If you push any further, people will start saying you’re going too far.”

“What did I even do?”

“… There’s no precedent for dragging a mistress’s insult all the way to court.”

Daemon’ hand, which was about to crumple the letter in frustration, paused.

“Adolf.”

“Yes.”

“Don’t let me hear that damned word ‘mistress’ again.”

“… I’ll be careful.”

Despite Adolf’s response, the scowl on Daemon’ face didn’t soften in the slightest. Mistress? No mistress in the world could compare to Liv. Liv isn’t just a mistress—

Liv is…

Daemon rose, his unfinished thoughts circling in his mind. It had been about ten minutes since he left the room, unable to discuss the trial details in front of Liv. When he had left, Liv was reading a book.

The thickness of the book suggested it couldn’t have been finished in just ten minutes, so she was probably in the same position as when he left. Yet, the longer she was out of his sight, the more anxious he felt.

Bang.

He opened the door abruptly and saw Liv perched on the large window sill. As he expected, she was in the same position as when he had left.

The only difference was that her eyes were now closed. The book was precariously balanced on her lap, her head tilted against the window, and she was fast asleep.

Sunlight poured in through the window, bathing her face in a warm glow. The warmth seemed to relax her, softening her features. Her auburn hair glimmered in the light, cascading messily over her neck.

Liv Rodaise isn’t just a mistress…

The unfinished thought kept drifting through his mind. Daemon stood in the doorway, staring at the sleeping Liv, then slowly stepped forward. Even the hand holding his cane moved with care, all his attention focused on not disturbing her rest.

Whether due to his careful approach or her deep sleep, Liv didn’t stir even as Daemon approached.

Up close, her cheeks were flushed pink, perhaps from the warmth of the sunlight. The loose strands of hair framing her face seemed especially endearing. All the annoying reports Adolf had delivered earlier vanished from Daemon’ mind, and all he could hear now was Liv’s steady breathing, coming from slightly parted lips.

Daemon, as if entranced, reached out and touched her lips.

Liv Rodaise is…

At that moment, Liv’s eyelids fluttered. Her green eyes, heavy with sleep, blinked in confusion before slowly regaining focus. Realizing she had dozed off, Liv let out a soft exclamation.

Daemon, who had watched her wake with rapt attention, suddenly had a thunderous realization.

‘Liv Rodaise is the only one.’

“Marquis?”

Liv’s puzzled expression met Daemon’ frozen gaze. He stood still, staring at her, his face pale, and his grip on his cane tightened.

“… Marquis?”

Sensing something was wrong, Liv called out to him again. The sleepiness had entirely vanished from her face, replaced by a look of concern. Yet, instead of answering her, Daemon turned away completely.

Now he understood the inexplicable anger that would sometimes flare up when he looked at Liv.

It wasn’t directed at Liv—it was at himself.

It was the anger of someone who had fumbled at the very beginning, oblivious to their own mistakes. Deep down, he had known instinctively that she was the only one capable of shaking him to his core.

The name of the desire to possess her, confine her, and never let her go…

The world would likely call it love. Though it was a word he had never uttered before, it seemed to fit.

The moment Daemon realized that all his anxiety, obsession, and irrational behavior stemmed from love, he acknowledged his complete defeat.

He had lost to her, and he would continue to lose for eternity.

Daemon was now afraid of Liv.

 



 

Daemon’ sudden announcement that he was leaving Adelinde was utterly bewildering.

Only when Liv heard his declaration did she realize that, despite repeatedly asking when he would leave, she had never truly expected him to go. She had unconsciously grown accustomed to his presence as their time together dragged on.

“I don’t know what brought this on so suddenly.”

Liv wasn’t the only one caught off guard. Adolf, Philip, and even Roman, who had been in charge of guarding the mansion, were all scrambling to adapt to the unexpected news. Roman, in particular, was busier than ever, as Daemon had ordered him to stay in Adelinde to guard Liv.

“How can I leave your side, Marquis?”

“There won’t be any danger without your protection.”

“You’ve seen how recklessly Lady Malte acts.”

“That’s why I’m leaving you here.”

Daemon ignored Roman’s protests as he packed his belongings. At that moment, he looked over in Liv’s direction. Liv returned his gaze, silently watching him.

Would he urge her to hurry and pack as well?

Before she could even fully form the thought, Daemon averted his gaze, as if there was nothing more he expected from her.

Given that Roman was staying behind, it seemed he hadn’t entirely decided to give her complete freedom. However, it was still strange that the man who had acted as if the world would end if she wasn’t in his sight was suddenly preparing to leave the mansion.

But more than anything, what bothered Liv the most was that she didn’t feel happy about it.

Once, she had wanted nothing more than to distance herself from Daemon, but now, with him actually leaving like this, she felt uneasy and unsettled.

Biting her lip, Liv approached Adolf and cautiously asked a question, “Is he going back to Buerno?”

“No, he’s heading to the capital.”

“I see.”

If it was the capital, could it be related to the dispute with Malte? Now that she thought about it, she hadn’t kept up with the newspapers lately. There might have been new developments that she was unaware of.

Since the riverside visit, Liv had spent her time absorbed in novels, using her ankle as an excuse but really just trying to distract herself from her confusion.

 

“I’ll always be here to brush off the dirt.”

 

She couldn’t get the image of Daemon casually tending to her ankle out of her mind. In truth, she couldn’t get rid of it at all. No matter how much she buried herself in books, all that came to mind was his gleaming platinum hair as he knelt before her.

To make matters worse, he hadn’t discarded the mud-stained gloves. Instead, he had gone so far as to bring them along and firmly instruct that they be cleaned properly. She had seen him continue to use the gloves she had gifted him, but she never imagined he would refuse to discard them, even when soiled with mud.

Given all this, it was impossible for Liv to remain composed. And now, Daemon was suddenly leaving.

This was the man who wouldn’t let her out of his sight for even half an hour, who always kept meetings with his subordinates as brief as possible. And now, immediately after announcing his departure, it was as if all his past behavior had been erased—he left her alone, as if she was nothing to him.

Was the matter in the capital truly that urgent? Or had his interest in her finally waned?

“Sister, did you hear?”

Liv, staring blankly at the bustling staff, felt a nudge in her side. Corida had approached her, gently poking her.

“Uncle Adolf said we can keep living in this mansion. They’re leaving behind enough guards and staff. Even Dr. Thierry will be staying.”

“I see.”

“He said he’ll help me with my studies again once the urgent business is over, so I should keep working hard until then.”

“Alright.”

“But he also said that it’s uncertain whether the marquis will return.”

 Lost in half-thoughts, Liv nodded absentmindedly but then paused.

Corida glanced at Liv’s face before speaking casually, “That marquis has severe insomnia, doesn’t he? He’s leaving despite not having recovered, which has made Dr. Thierry quite anxious.”

Corida, who had been pouting her lips while chatting, turned to go study. Even after Corida left, Liv remained in place.

“Ha…”

Liv let out an involuntary sigh. No matter how she looked at it, Daemon’ actions were sudden and rushed—so much so that even his subordinates were taken aback. She was tired of agonizing over his erratic and unpredictable behavior by herself.

Clenching her teeth, Liv strode over to Daemon.

“The transportation…”

“Marquis.”

Standing in the middle of the lobby, Daemon, who had been giving instructions to Philip, quickly turned around at Liv’s call. His immediate response was something Liv had grown accustomed to during her time at the mansion.

The idea that his interest had waned didn’t make sense, not when he reacted to her voice this way. Just look at his eyes.

“Are you busy?”

“What is it?”

“If you’re not busy, I’d like to ask for a moment of your time.”

Daemon hesitated for a moment at Liv’s request, then frowned slightly and averted his gaze.

“Well…”

“Do you have no intention of giving me any of your time? If so, I’ll ask you here.”

Liv continued without hesitation, “Are you tired of me now?”

Liv’s blunt and candid question caused not only Daemon but also the bustling staff to freeze momentarily. The employees glanced at Liv in surprise, but under Philip’s sharp glare, they quickly dispersed. While Philip tactfully cleared the area, Daemon remained still, staring at Liv with a hardened expression.

He processed her words over and over before he finally understood.

“Ha, tired of you?”

“Yes.”

Daemon’ face twisted coldly in an instant.

“Are you happy that I’m leaving? Because you think I’m tired of you? Sorry to disappoint, but I won’t fulfill that hope. So…”

“Then why has your attitude suddenly changed?”

Daemon, who had been speaking sharply, paused. Liv looked him straight in the eyes.

“I can’t figure you out, Marquis. Just when I think I understand you, I don’t. And now…”

The words that had flowed freely suddenly caught in her throat. It was the surge of emotion that stopped her. Liv bit her trembling lower lip, trying to suppress her feelings, and then spoke calmly, her voice subdued.

“I’m tired of guessing and imagining on my own.”

If he had thought of her as merely a mistress, he wouldn’t act this way.

Living in the mansion with him, Liv had come to that conclusion. She wasn’t his mistress—far from it. She wasn’t even a courtesan. She had never heard of a nobleman washing a courtesan’s feet with such care.

His restless behavior when she wasn’t by his side, acting like a child who had lost his mother, his joy at receiving gifts when she merely made requests, the way he ignored everything to stick close to her despite his subordinates’ objections—all of it.

All of it was far from ordinary.

“Please, just make it clear to me.”

“Make what clear?”

“Why are you doing this to me?”

They were having the same conversation they once had in this lobby. The only difference was that Liv didn’t have a gun in her hand this time.

Despite her question, Daemon’ expression didn’t change much. He remained indifferent.

“If I give you an answer…”

Daemon’ blue eyes darkened deeply. He hesitated for a while before finally parting his lips slowly.

“Would you put even a withered rose in a vase?”

It was an unusually cautious question for a man who was always so arrogant and aloof.

But the gaze that followed the careful question was intense and persistent. It was hard to believe that this was the same man who had refused to even look at her, claiming he would leave her behind.

Liv could tell without much difficulty that he still wanted her. If he wished, he could easily make a place for her among his luggage. Perhaps, in his mind, he had imagined it dozens of times. If he forced her, she had no power to resist.

And yet, he gave her no commands.

“Marquis.”

Liv called out to him, her voice tightly restrained. She took a deep breath and finally let out the question she hadn’t been able to ask that day.

“Do you love me?”

Daemon’ brow furrowed slightly, but no emotion showed on his face.

Half-expecting his answer, Liv felt her heart sink at his rather dry reaction. Had she misunderstood again, hoping for something on her own?

Though she had grown accustomed to the recent changes in Daemon, Liv still remembered the way he used to sigh and click his tongue at her. How he acted as if he’d grant her anything, only to draw a line when she got too close, telling her to know her place.

As memories of the past resurfaced, a hint of fear appeared in Liv’s eyes. She quickly averted her gaze to hide it, but Daemon had never taken his eyes off her in the first place, so her effort was futile. He must have noticed the feelings she had just revealed.

“I’m going to the capital to put Lady Malte on trial.”

Daemon continued in a flat voice, “I’m going to hold her accountable in front of everyone. She lost her dignity as a great noble and acted recklessly out of personal feelings.”

It wasn’t an answer to her question. Yet, Liv didn’t have the courage to press him as she had earlier.

Was his refusal to answer a way of indirectly responding? Maybe he was using such sophisticated means to show that her question wasn’t even worth answering.

As Liv slowly blinked, ready to let out a sigh of resignation, Daemon’ voice reached her ears.

“I plan to publicly condemn her for spreading nonsense about someone I hold dear, calling her a mistress, and for openly insulting and dishonoring her.”

Liv, who had been looking down, raised her head. Daemon met her gaze directly, his blue eyes unwavering as they bore into her own.

“What do you think this feeling is?”

Daemon spoke again, his gaze locked on her.

“There’s only one name I can think of for this feeling.”

Liv couldn’t even breathe. She felt as if her heart had plummeted.

“I just don’t know if you’ll agree with me.”

After murmuring softly to himself, Daemon fell silent. Only then did Liv, hearing the softened tone at the end, manage to move her lips, which had felt sealed shut.

“…Do I mean that much to you? Or is this just stubbornness because I won’t bend to your will?”

Whether he sensed the faint distrust in her question, Daemon let out a sardonic smile.

“Stubbornness? Letting go of unnecessary emotions is cleaner and easier for me.”

He added in a cold tone, clearly denying her words, “With everything else, I’ve never felt a sense of lack—except when it comes to you.”

Liv stared blankly at Daemon. His platinum hair, swept back elegantly, his cool blue eyes, his arrogantly raised chin—all of it was the same as she knew. The face that had always spat out harsh mockery and disdain.

She had been the one to ask if he loved her, but hearing his response, it still didn’t feel real. The fact that Daemon wore his usual cold expression only added to the surreal feeling.

Not knowing how to react, Liv remained silent, and Daemon frowned slightly as he watched her. Whatever crossed his mind, his expression didn’t look particularly pleasant.

He licked his lower lip before speaking slowly, “Cardinal Calliope will soon become Gratia.”

Daemon’ expression soured at the mention of Cardinal Calliope. He paused briefly before continuing, as if making a decision, his voice smooth and clear, “Thanks to that, I’m about to become Gratia’s unofficial bastard.”

Liv’s eyes widened at the unexpected revelation.

As if uninterested in her reaction, Daemon quickly continued, “Officially, I’ll be known as a noble who took Gratia as his patron and godfather. It’s obvious whose favor the sly ones will seek.

Daemon ran a hand through his hair and let out a short sigh.

“So, there won’t be anything I’ll be lacking in the future either. I won’t lose the trial, and your life won’t be affected by it.”

It seemed Daemon believed Liv was worried about the trial with Malte causing her some disadvantage. Since she had already suffered because of Luzia in Buerno, perhaps he thought she was afraid of facing similar difficulties again.

When Liv still didn’t respond, Daemon, who seemed ready to say more, clicked his tongue and closed his mouth. He turned away completely, as if he had nothing more to say.

Watching his retreating back, Liv found herself speaking without realizing it.

“Even if you win the trial, you’ll still be ridiculed as a foolish man who made unnecessary enemies because he was blinded by a mere woman.”

Daemon paused and glanced back at her.

“If that happens…”

He tilted his head slightly, narrowing his eyes.

“Then maybe, to avoid getting tangled with me, no one will dare set their eyes on you.”

Daemon, now with a brighter expression, murmured casually and laughed.

And Liv stood there, dazed, until Daemon, satisfied, left the lobby after giving her a light kiss on the lips.

 
The air in the capital city of Peron was sharp and thick.

It was a bustling city filled with steam automobiles, with the largest train station in the region connecting all the railroads, and factories expanding across the outskirts, their machines running day and night. Yet, it was also a lively place where people from all walks of life gathered, where extravagant parties went on even at night, and festivals and events happened throughout the year.

With such an atmosphere, the city’s major buildings were as imposing as its energy suggested. Among them, the Royal Court building was known for its tradition and history. Adjacent to it was the grandest chapel in Beren, always bustling with pilgrims, even under normal circumstances.

And when a case intriguing enough to draw public interest was being tried at the courthouse? Naturally, reporters from various newspapers camped out with their cameras and pens for hours on end.

Such was the case today.

The hidden life of a noble lady, the only daughter of a prestigious foreign family, who chased a handsome man across borders!

When scrutinized, the case hardly warranted such an uproarious public trial. Journalists with good connections knew that secret negotiations had taken place among several great nobles to keep the matter quiet.

Still, the situation escalated, all because of the mysterious man named Marquis Dietrion. He had insisted on a public apology, forcing open the courthouse doors. Naturally, the newspapers were intrigued by this enigmatic man.

“He must be quite petty if he’s going this far to protect his pride against a defenseless woman,” remarked a reporter waiting in front of the courthouse to his assistant.

There wasn’t much known about Marquis Dietrion. The most objective and accurate information available seemed to be about his appearance.

He had earned some notoriety in provincial towns simply for his looks, leading many to assume he was just some distant branch of a noble family with a face worth looking at.

“Anyone who humiliates Malte like this must be a fool who doesn’t understand his place.”

“Maybe he’s a nouveau riche who suddenly inherited a vast fortune from a relative?”

“And a nouveau riche would dare to touch Malte? Not to mention being tangled up with Eleonore too. He’s turned other members of the upper class, connected to those two families, into his enemies. Would anyone in their right mind do that?”

The reporter clicked his tongue and shook his head. He personally thought well of Luzia, whom he had seen from afar.

He didn’t believe the rumors that Luzia had joined the peaceful pilgrimage to meet a man with ill intentions. Provincial people tended to have narrow perspectives and would close ranks tightly among themselves.

But Peron was different. Unlike the closed-off provincial towns, Peron was full of open-minded judges and lawyers who could evaluate cases objectively.

“At the very least, his ability to stir things up so much is quite intriguing… Oh?”

“It seems that’s the carriage!”

The complaining reporter, rubbing his stiff shoulders, sprang to his feet. His assistant also widened his eyes and pointed at something.

A jet-black four-wheeled carriage adorned with luxurious golden bars came to a stop in front of the courthouse gates. A crowd of onlookers surged toward the carriage, only to be blocked by sturdy guards. The reporter and his assistant were no exception.

Fortunately, the reporter had secured an excellent spot from the start, putting him at the front of the crowd. As a result, he got a clear view of the person emerging as the carriage door opened.

The man wore a black top hat and had his collar turned up, his cravat covering his entire neck. He was dressed in a black frock coat and held an ivory-handled cane in his gloved hand.

His tall frame suited his elegant, all-black attire perfectly. Yet, no one had the mental capacity to take in his luxurious outfit or his impeccable posture. It was his face under the brim of his hat that made everyone forget all else.

His cold blue eyes swept across the crowd indifferently from the shadow cast by his hat. Just this alone made a few people unable to suppress gasps of admiration. The man ignored the sound, as if used to it, and stepped forward.

The reporter watched the man’s face, transfixed.

He had pale skin and sharp facial lines, a face no sculptor could ever carve to such perfection. His lips, straight and red, seemed somewhat irritable, but it only added to his allure.

Although the gathered crowd seemed eager to speak to him, no one managed to utter a word.

The man and his presumed entourage proceeded calmly into the courthouse along the path the guards had cleared in advance. It was neither too slow nor too fast.

Clang!

The main doors of the courthouse, which had been opened for the man, closed behind him. That sound seemed to break the spell, and one by one, the people who had been staring blankly began to collect themselves.

“Phew…”

The reporter, who had let out an involuntary sigh, tried to catch a glimpse inside the courthouse. But the man had already entered the building and was out of sight.

In the end, despite waiting for hours, the reporter achieved none of his goals. Marquis Dietrion remained a mystery, without a single piece of concrete information.

“One thing is certain.”

“…What is that?”

“He’s got such an astonishing beauty that even the great Lady Malte couldn’t help but chase after him.”

The reporter mumbled in a defeated tone. He would get an earful from the editor for failing to obtain anything useful, and it would be difficult to write an article with so little information. But for now, he couldn’t think of anything else.

Absentmindedly, he settled on a headline for his story: “The Appearance of Marquis Dietrion, Blessed by Divine Grace.”

 



 

The man who had caused such a stir in the capital remained indifferent to everything.

The proceedings of the trial went as Adolf and the other legal advisors had anticipated, and Malte’s reaction was similarly predictable. It was so predictable that it bored him to the point of yawning.

Ignoring the longing glances from people who clearly wanted to speak with him, Daemon glanced up at the overcast sky.

From the moment he entered the courthouse, the movement of the clouds had seemed strange. Now, dark gray clouds covered the entire sky, and though it was not yet sunset, the sun was nowhere to be seen. It seemed likely that it would rain continuously starting tomorrow.

The trial was set to continue for several days, and today was just the first day. Enraged by Daemon’ insistence on appearing in court, Luzia was likely to bring up the false accusations he had faced during his military service at the next trial, so Daemon had to return to his lodging to prepare.

His lodging was one of the most luxurious hotels in the capital, with large windows offering a view of the entire city. Charles had hinted that he could relax and enjoy the evening scenery from there.

But such things were of no interest to him.

All of Daemon’ thoughts were with Adelinde. Why wouldn’t they be?

On the day he left, Liv hadn’t even come out to see him off. The last time he saw her, she had been standing silently by the window. The sunlight reflecting off the unusually shiny glass made it impossible for him to see her expression.

He had left Roman, Thierry, and Philip behind in Adelinde, yet from the moment he stepped out of the mansion, Daemon had felt restless. Deep down, he didn’t want her out of his sight.

At the same time, though, he feared Liv. He kept losing confidence when faced with an opponent he couldn’t overcome.

 

“I’ve never felt a sense of lack—except when it comes to you.”

 

He yearned for Liv. But not knowing what to do with that longing, he had fled to the capital to deal with Luzia first—much like Liv had done.

 

“I ran because I couldn’t handle it.”

 

He hadn’t understood those words when she first said them, but now that he found himself in a similar situation, he understood a little. She likely couldn’t control her feelings, a sentiment so inexplicable that she simply wanted to push it out of her sight. Since she couldn’t push Daemon away, she had left instead.

Did that mean she had run away with the same feelings he had now?

Daemon understood her fleeing, but unfortunately, he couldn’t entertain such optimistic thoughts. He remembered their conversation in the Adelinde mansion lobby.

Liv had asked if he loved her.

Before he could even answer, she had shown fear.

How could he interpret that fear in a positive light? If he were to say that he loved her, she would likely be terrified and try to run again. Since their reunion, Liv had come to expect nothing from him.

Remembering the indifference and distance Liv had shown during their time in Adelinde, it seemed more natural that she found his feelings burdensome.

 

“You’re the one who told me to know my place, Marquis.”

 

That remark had come back to him like a boomerang. Liv had rigorously adhered to her “place,” and as a result, his love had only instilled fear in her.

Because of this, Daemon couldn’t bring himself to clearly define his feelings for her.

He was afraid of her, but he didn’t want her to be afraid of him. If Liv, gripped by fear, tried to leave him again, he couldn’t predict what he might do.

 “Daemon!”

Daemon stopped in mid-thought, his gaze still fixed on the sky. Approaching with her attendants, panting, was Luzia.

Caught up in his own thoughts for too long, Daemon had wasted time. He clicked his tongue in annoyance. His guards tried to stop Luzia, but Daemon waved them off to indicate it was alright. Luzia, too, shook off her own attendants and approached him with confident strides.

Luzia’s face was half-covered by a black veil attached to her hat, but it did nothing to hide her angry expression.

“I understand whom you’re relying on for support, but do you really think that person will keep helping you?”

“Huh?”

“Between you, who hold nothing but an empty title, and us, the Malte family, who do you think would be of more use to that person? You will pay for dragging me here.”

“I have no idea what you’re talking about. I’m merely trying to protect the honor of the woman I love.”

“The woman you love? How preposterous! Do you think I don’t see through your excuse of targeting Malte under the pretense of that woman? Are you in cahoots with Stephan to make a fool out of me?”

Daemon, looking at Luzia with bored eyes as she ranted, let out a low sigh.

“If you miss that idiot so much, how about leaving someone else’s woman alone and clinging to him instead?”

“You…!”

Luzia clenched her fist, unable to contain her fury. It seemed she was unaware of the fact that the two of them were standing outside the courthouse, where reporters who had waited since early morning were now clinging to the walls, watching them.

Of course, it was unlikely the reporters could hear their conversation.

But even if they couldn’t hear, that didn’t mean they couldn’t guess what was going on. At the very least, everyone could tell Luzia was furious.

Daemon narrowed his eyes. He tilted his head slightly, turning away so that his face was hidden from the reporters as he spoke with a smirk, “Foul-smelling mud should be washed off as soon as possible, don’t you think?”

“What did you say?”

“I promised to brush off the mud when it got on me. But since it’s so filthy, I might as well deal with it properly once and for all.”

Fire flashed in Luzia’s eyes through the black veil. A grinding sound could be heard from her clenched teeth before she swung her hand with all her strength.

Smack!

Daemon could have dodged, but he willingly offered his cheek. At the same time, a camera flash went off from somewhere nearby.

That was what seemed to snap Luzia out of her rage. She suddenly became aware of all the eyes watching her and bit her lip.

“Marquis!”

Daemon gestured dismissively at the startled Charles, then fixed his cold gaze on Luzia.

“Adolf, file charges for assault, separate from the ongoing case.”

Luzia blinked rapidly, clearly taken aback by Daemon’ words.

“A-assault? This is absurd! You, of all people, who committed murder in front of me, dare say this?”

“My, my, Lady Malte. Do you have a witness, or perhaps any evidence?”

Luzia’s face turned beet red.

Naturally, she had none. When Daemon had shot a man in front of her, she’d been too stunned to collect any proof. She suspected the aides who had disappeared afterward had also been killed by Daemon, but without bodies, it was impossible to prove anything.

“If there’s nothing more to say, I’ll take my leave.”

Ignoring Luzia, whose mouth opened and closed wordlessly, Daemon turned away with composure. A red scratch, likely from Luzia’s long nails, remained on his cheek. Instead of looking unsightly, the mark added a poignant aura to the otherwise icy man.

No one dared speak to him, and just like when he had arrived, Daemon moved leisurely toward his carriage, as if ready to leave.

However, just as everyone expected him to ignore them all, Daemon suddenly stopped in his tracks. His gaze was fixed beyond the crowd.

The people standing where his eyes landed began murmuring and stepped aside. In the empty space that formed, one person stood alone.

Looking awkward at the sudden attention, it was Liv. She seemed slightly taken aback that Daemon had found her so quickly.

The calm stride he had shown earlier disappeared as Daemon swiftly approached her and pulled her along. Liv tried to say something, but Daemon spoke first in a low voice.

“We’ll talk in the carriage.”

There were too many ears around them. Some people even had cameras. Daemon pulled down the brim of Liv’s hat and wrapped his arm around her shoulders.

Someone who recognized Liv attempted to raise their camera, but Daemon’ guards immediately blocked them.

In the meantime, Daemon hurriedly led Liv into the carriage and shut the door behind them.

“Where is Sir Roman?”

“He was beside me.”

Was he? From the moment Daemon saw Liv, everyone else had naturally vanished from his awareness, so he couldn’t remember.

In any case, if Roman had been beside her, it meant that Liv had come here of her own accord.

“Why are you here?”

Though he’d longed to see her, Daemon didn’t like the inevitable exposure of “Liv Rodaise” in the capital. The gossip surrounding Malte, Eleonore, and his own name was already more than enough.

“I heard the trial was taking longer than expected…”

“I meant, why did you come to the capital?”

Daemon’ sharp voice made Liv’s expression darken slightly.

“Am I an inconvenience to you, Marquis?”

Daemon hesitated at her question. After a moment of silence, he spoke slowly, “Your name could be in the papers by tomorrow morning.”

“…Judging by the crowd earlier, I suppose that’s likely.”

Liv nodded, a complicated expression crossing her face. It seemed she hadn’t fully realized the extent of public attention and had come here without much thought.

Should he have just ignored her?

But how could he ignore what he saw? She stood out as exceptionally beautiful—if he left her among the crowd, she’d surely attract the attention of all sorts of men. It was better to draw attention now and get her into the carriage quickly.

Easily justifying his actions, Daemon asked again, “That’s why I’m asking you. Didn’t you dislike things like this?”

“You dislike it too, don’t you, Marquis?”

It was true. The only reason he was putting up with this unwanted attention was all because of Liv.

Daemon stared intently at Liv. Since leaving Adelinde, he’d felt like he was crawling on the ground, but now, an unfamiliar sense of hope was starting to grow within him.

She had willingly left his side, so why had she come here herself?

Daemon was about to press her for an answer, but before he could, Liv, who had her hands folded in her lap and her gaze lowered, suddenly took something from her coat and handed it to him.

It was his bottle of sleeping pills.

The smile that had been forming on Daemon’ lips immediately faded.

Holding the pill bottle, Daemon debated briefly whether to toss it out the window. Ultimately, he gripped the bottle tightly, suppressing the impulse.

Surely, this wasn’t the reason she’d come all this way—there had to be something more.

“You didn’t come all this way just to give me this, did you?”

It seemed she had something else to say, but Liv hesitated, biting her lip and looking around nervously. Finally, she took a deep breath.

“You said this trial is to protect my honor.”

Liv gripped the hem of her skirt tightly, her voice calm as she continued, “I thought it wouldn’t be right for me, as the person involved, to stay distant and wait as if it were someone else’s business.”

This time, Daemon felt genuine disappointment.

Considering Liv’s personality, her explanation made sense. She seemed to feel a sense of responsibility and guilt over the trouble he was going through for her.

The tension that had been building in his shoulders eased, and he loosened his grip on the pill bottle. Forcing his expression into neutrality, Daemon tossed the bottle onto the empty seat and looked away from Liv.

At that moment, he heard a surprised voice, followed by a warm touch on his cheek. Turning his head, he saw Liv, wide-eyed, leaning close to him.

Meeting his gaze, Liv quickly tried to pull away, but Daemon caught her hand, keeping her palm pressed against his cheek.

“Touch it. You used to like touching my scars, didn’t you?”

“I-I…!”

Liv blushed, clearly flustered.

 Earlier, when Luzia’s face had turned red, it had looked so ugly, but Liv’s flushed cheeks were nothing short of adorable.

Forget the formal trial proceedings—Daemon decided he would deal with Luzia in the shortest time possible. Even if she claimed to be afraid, having Liv in front of him was still beneficial for his mind and soul. Especially since she had come all the way to the capital on her own, he couldn’t afford to waste time on the trial.

Unaware of the sudden changes in Daemon’ schedule, Liv was just trying to calm her flushed face. She finally managed to regain her composure and slowly withdrew the hand she had pressed against his cheek. Her green eyes focused on the long scratch that marred his cheek.

“It looks like it was caused by a nail.”

Liv’s voice, as she spoke, was oddly stiff. Her lips were pressed into a tight line, and it seemed like she was exerting force to keep them that way.

“I’m afraid the scar won’t last long, as it’s just a light scratch.”

“I see.”

Suddenly, Liv’s tone turned curt. She lowered her gaze a little too abruptly and spoke in a blunt voice, “I never realized you were someone who’d let others touch your face so easily.”

“Thanks to that, I have more grounds to press charges.”

Daemon responded indifferently and added as if in passing, “Don’t worry. I won’t hold you accountable for the scratches you make every night.”

He expected Liv’s calm demeanor to turn red again, but instead, she simply looked at him in silence. The green eyes that had briefly wavered now settled quietly, her thoughts unreadable.

After a moment, Liv pursed her lips tightly, and a short sigh escaped.

“Even if it withers and dries up…”

Finally, Liv cautiously spoke again, “Do you know that a dried flower can still be beautiful?”

Daemon had never considered dried flowers to be beautiful. However, what did his opinion matter? He quickly nodded.

“If it seems beautiful to you, then it must be.”

“But is it right to keep a dried flower in a vase just because it’s beautiful?”

Liv swallowed hard, her gaze dropping as if she couldn’t bear to keep looking at him.

“Perhaps it would be better not to touch it at all. Once a rose has withered, no amount of water can bring it back, and it might shatter if mishandled. Rather than break it and regret it…”

“Then don’t put it in a vase—keep it in a glass case. There’s no need to water it, after all.”

Liv’s uncertain words trailed off.

“And occasionally take a look at it.”

Liv, who had been staring at the floor, slowly raised her head. Her green eyes were trembling intensely.

“Even if it’s just for admiration, keep it by your side.”

Daemon’ lips twisted into a smile.

“If it’s withered yet beautiful, then it’ll stay beautiful forever without fear of decay. That’s not a bad thing, is it?”

Liv’s tightly pressed lips trembled. She looked at Daemon with a face that seemed on the verge of tears, then reached out her hand. Warm breath brushed against his lips—a movement as cautious and gentle as if touching dried petals.

Daemon fully surrendered himself to that shy, warm kiss.

It was the moment when the man, who had once been deemed unattainable by anyone, was finally marked by possession.

 



 

“Find a way to put her in the convent—no exceptions.”

The abrupt command left Adolf and Charles in stunned silence. After a moment, Adolf was the first to recover and responded with an awkward laugh.

“She is the only daughter of the Malte family, Marquis.”

“And?”

“I mean, she’s an only child…”

“Send the Malte family some effective fertility medicine.”

Interrupting Adolf, Daemon coldly continued, “The Duke and Duchess of Malte are still healthy. They can have another child.”

Even Adolf, who had tried to reason logically, found himself at a loss for words. He knew that explaining how the Malte family would interpret such an outlandish gift as fertility medicine would fall on deaf ears.

They should have been preparing for the next trial, but Daemon’ mind had long wandered elsewhere—specifically, beyond that closed hotel room door.

“Make sure no one approaches until I call.”

Daemon gave his final order to Roman, who was standing a step back, before turning his body. Charles’ face tensed with urgency.

“Marquis! You can’t take more than two days!”

“The next trial date is already set! We can’t delay it!”

Adolf also chimed in urgently, but Daemon entered the room without a backward glance.

The two men, left staring at the firmly shut door, wore helpless expressions. From inside, the sound of the door being locked echoed coldly.

“…Sigh.”

The hallway on the top floor of the hotel was filled with sighs—no one knew whose.

 



 

Following Daemon to his lodgings had been an impulsive decision.

Well… after embracing and kissing him with her own hands, perhaps what followed was inevitable. However, when Liv had first left Adelinde, her heart hadn’t been entirely clear. Even after arriving in the capital, it hadn’t been.

That was why she hadn’t bothered to contact any of Daemon’ attendants, such as Adolf or Charles, in advance. Even as she followed Daemon, she still hadn’t fully decided on her feelings.

Liv thought of the large crowd that had gathered in front of the courthouse. People were chattering about Daemon, each with their own opinion. His impressive appearance, his enigmatic connections, his audacity in confronting powerful figures—these were all topics of discussion.

It was the same sort of talk she had heard often in Buerno. The “unrealistic Marquis Dietrion,” who seemed to have nothing to do with her.

Listening to the conversations floating in the air, Daemon suddenly felt unfamiliar. It was hard to believe that the man clinging to her in Adelinde was the same person who had become the subject of everyone’s attention.

If Daemon hadn’t noticed her first, Liv might not have approached him at all. Even now, standing on the top floor of a luxurious hotel, being led here by his hand, she still felt a sense of unreality.

Liv absently rubbed her arm and belatedly looked around the room she had entered. Everything in it was lavish and of the highest quality—no need to scrutinize it in detail.

Crossing the thick red carpet, Liv moved into the inner room, where she found a long velvet sofa, a table, and a lit fireplace. The shelves were filled with expensive-looking liquor bottles and glasses, and a large, beautiful tapestry hung on the wall.

Past the sitting area was a room with a grand piano. A piano in a hotel room—perhaps it was meant to be enjoyed with the view.

Without thinking, Liv’s fingers brushed the piano keys, and a memory from the past flashed through her mind.

She remembered nervously pressing the keys, the man’s hand that touched her back, clothes falling to the floor, the continuation of their performance in their bare skin…

Quickly pulling her hand away from the white keys, Liv fanned her flushed face and hurried into the next room.

This time, she expected to find the bedroom, but instead, she found another sitting area with a beautifully embroidered sofa, and tables adorned with ornaments decorating the walls.

As Liv absentmindedly glanced over the glittering decorations, she suddenly stopped.

At first glance, it looked like a water jug. But the swan-like handle, the unusually narrow spout, and the delicate, fragile-looking material revealed its true purpose—decoration, not utility.

The surface was engraved with geometric patterns and adorned with finely crafted jewels, extending to a base inscribed with the artisan’s signature.

“Do you like it?”

Liv, who had been staring blankly, quickly tried to turn around, but before she could, a thick, firm arm wrapped around her waist.

“Everything displayed in this room is rare. There’s no harm in purchasing them.”

Though they weren’t artwork, each piece had its own value.

As Liv felt the man’s presence close behind her, she muttered quietly, “Because they’re made by artisans who are no longer with us?”

“I didn’t expect you to figure it out so quickly.”

Daemon’ words, whispered into her ear, sounded like praise. Without taking her eyes off the ornament, Liv replied, “At the very least, I can tell the artisan who made this is no longer alive.”

Daemon’ movements, which had been teasing her neck and ears, suddenly stopped. Liv, however, continued staring at the base of the ornament, taking in the signature over and over.

“…It’s the work of the Rodaise couple.”

“Yes.”

Liv’s lips twisted subtly.

“My parents made it.”

She hadn’t expected to find her parents’ work here. Her expression changed in an odd way.

The hotel had quite a bit of history. It had been operating even during her childhood, making it over twenty-five years old.

The top floor, in particular, had always been a place where distinguished guests stayed, and her parents had once joked that they’d eventually have their work displayed here.

“I never imagined I’d come across my parents’ work so soon.”

Liv Rodaise was born in the capital city.

She had lived there until she entered boarding school, moving through various neighborhoods of the city. Despite being from a middle-class family, her parents’ skill had ensured a prosperous childhood filled with happy memories. Every corner of the city held memories for her. Until her parents’ carriage accident, her memories of the capital were only good ones.

It was because she couldn’t bear those memories that she had wandered with Corida through the provinces.

 “Honestly, I never thought I’d come back to the capital.”

“Why is that?”

“Because I left with no intention of ever returning.”

Perhaps it was because of the memories from her childhood that lingered in the city. Everywhere she went, old memories surfaced, softening her heart. However, as someone responsible for Corida, Liv couldn’t afford to let her guard down. She couldn’t continue caring for her ailing sister and making a living with a fragile heart. Drowning in memories made her resent her current reality.

Her hesitant fingers brushed against the base of the water jug, touching the familiar signature. It was her parents’ signature, which she’d seen so often that it had become almost dull. Now, seeing it again after so long, it looked elegant and dignified. It felt strange to see that her parents’ work was valuable enough to decorate a room in such a luxurious hotel.

While Liv was lost in sentiment, Daemon turned her to face him, locking eyes.

“Is this a confession?”

“What?”

“You said you left with no intention of coming back, yet you’re here now. Does that mean you missed me that much?”

Well…

Liv looked up at Daemon, her expression vague, unsure how to respond. Daemon seemed determined to get an answer from her, and his persistence was evident in his piercing blue eyes.

“You still want me, don’t you?”

It was as if nothing short of an answer would satisfy him. It wasn’t even some grand, heartfelt love confession.

“Do I really have to say it outright?”

“Yes.”

The insistence in his voice was almost childish, and without realizing it, Liv found herself thinking that Daemon was rather cute. At the same time, she couldn’t help but feel how hopeless this thought was.

Just a while ago, standing in front of the courthouse, she had felt such distance from him. Yet now, being alone together, Daemon no longer felt like the “great marquis” of the past. He no longer seemed like some unattainable, expensive possession—he now felt like someone she could reach for if she simply extended her hand. No longer did desiring him feel like committing a great sin.

Her heart felt lighter, strangely enough. As Liv pondered her emotions, she realized something.

She now had the right to choose.

Coming to the capital, following Daemon here, was her decision.

She could stay if she wanted him, or leave if she didn’t. Regardless of Daemon’ wishes, she now had the confidence to act on her own choice, guided solely by her own feelings.

“I want you, but I’m not sure if my feelings are pure.”

“Pure feelings?”

“I mean… I’m not sure if it’s romantic and beautiful love.”

Daemon responded with a low chuckle to her musing. “Sorry, but if you’re talking about pure, unblemished love, I can’t fulfill that fantasy.”

His tone was cynical as he lifted Liv’s chin gently, making her meet his gaze directly. With his eyes locking on hers, Daemon spoke again in a deep, husky voice, “So, there’s no need for your feelings to be that way either.”

Daemon’ voice murmured in her ear, dismissing any notions of needing a romantic love that could endure hardships for the sake of one person. Underneath his words, despite all the restraint, lay a raw desire he could not completely hide.

“Don’t just be content; want more. Desire whatever you wish. That’s enough for me.”

Liv couldn’t answer. His lips, desperate and demanding, claimed hers, swallowing her breath.

The sky outside the window was overcast, though the sun had not yet set.

The kiss, which began in front of the ornaments, ended with Liv being backed into the bedroom, her clothes scattered haphazardly around her feet.

In the time they had stayed at the Adelinde mansion, Daemon’ skill at undressing her had vastly improved. Now, regardless of the position, he could quickly strip her bare. Within a few steps, Liv found herself naked on the bed.

Feeling embarrassed by the bright room—the curtains were still open—Liv tried to cover herself with a blanket. But Daemon, finding it cumbersome, tossed the blanket off the bed, leaving her exposed. The chill in the room made her shiver slightly.

Daemon lay atop Liv, pressing her down as he kissed her again. His desperate, sucking kisses left her breathless. The way he hungrily licked and explored every corner of her mouth reminded her of a beast that had starved for months.

It wasn’t as if they hadn’t made love in a while. It had only been a few days since he left Adelinde and reunited with her in the capital.

Still, there was something different in the urgency of his actions today—the way his lips and tongue explored her mouth, her neck, her shoulders. It felt different.

Was it just a matter of mindset?

“Ah!”

As if sensing her distracted thoughts, Daemon bit down on her shoulder. The pressure left a faint mark, but her hypersensitive body interpreted even that as a stimulus.

Her unexpected moan made Daemon pause briefly. Then, with more force, he sucked on her skin, leaving red marks blooming like scattered petals. He wouldn’t stop until her entire upper body was covered in bruises.

The cool air seemed to grow warmer, the temperature of the room rising along with their shared body heat. Panting heavily, Liv wrapped her arms around the man’s head as it lay against her chest, her fingers weaving through his soft platinum hair.

“Ha…”

As Liv’s hands moved down his neck, Daemon, with his head still resting against her chest, let out a sigh. His hot breath tickled the flushed marks on her skin.

When her hand, obstructed by his shirt, stopped, Daemon removed his cravat, pulling it free and tossing it aside. In the process, he tore off a few shirt buttons, his movements quick as he stripped off his loose shirt.

His torso, covered in scars, came into view. Liv, still panting, reached out almost reflexively, her fingers grazing the scarred skin as if it were alive.

Daemon seemed to enjoy her touch on his scars. As he loosened his waistband, he pulled Liv up onto his lap, changing their position in an instant. He held her close, their faces level, her legs straddling his muscular thighs.

With Daemon’ large build, Liv felt as if she were enveloped entirely by him. She leaned back into his support and brushed her fingers along the scars that had drawn closer.

“When did you get this one?”

Tracing the raised scar along his chest, she asked quietly. She wasn’t necessarily looking for an answer—it was more an idle observation, a thought that it must have been painful.

“Second battle. A ground battle in Avrimo.”

To her surprise, Daemon answered immediately without hesitation. His direct response caught her off guard, and she looked up at him, astonished. Then, without thinking, she touched the scar on the opposite side—a small cross-shaped one tinged red.

“That one came from an operation in Alfeo.”

He answered before she even asked. Her fingers moved to a brownish scar beside it, resembling paint splattered across a page.

“A scar from an explosion in Quirino.”

Daemon’ hand moved slowly down Liv’s back as he spoke.

He went on to tell her about each of his scars—some small ones he didn’t remember precisely, but all the large, prominent ones were etched clearly in his memory.

His chest was like a map, the battlefields of his past drawn upon it.

“Do you remember them all?”

“Unfortunately.”

His tone was casual, as if they meant little to him, as if they were all just things of the past.

However, hearing his response only made Liv feel a deeper tenderness. The clarity with which he remembered his scars seemed to contradict his claim that they were meaningless.

“Do you pity me?”

“Do you want my pity?”

“If you pity me, you won’t throw me away. You’re too gentle for that.”

What did he take her for? Liv let out a breathy laugh as she ran her hand over his bare chest.

“I don’t pity you. These scars are proof of the fierce struggle you went through to survive. I wouldn’t presume to judge that time.”

She whispered in a soft voice, her fingers lightly scratching over Daemon’ chest.

“But I do respect it.”

Daemon’ muscular chest swelled at her touch. His grip on her waist tightened. Though Liv knew she was provoking him, she showed no hesitation. Instead, she traced his scars more firmly.

Their eyes met—his bright blue eyes were still striking, the face of an arrogant beauty. Who could ever guess, just by looking at his face, that he had a body covered in scars?

Ah, perhaps no one would ever know. To others, Daemon would always be an irritable, sensitive, and precious man.

Realizing this, Liv felt a fierce, burning desire rise within her.

“I won’t let you go—give yourself to me.”

Wrapping her arms around Daemon’ neck, Liv whispered in a hushed voice, “All of you, Daemon.”

 The desire for possession, which Liv had never realized resided within her, spread like wildfire, heating her entire body.

This desire felt justified. Daemon had provoked it, and Liv felt no guilt in wanting him, in claiming him.

Instead of answering, Daemon pressed his lips to hers fiercely. The gentle caresses from moments before turned urgent, and with a powerful shove, Liv found herself once again lying on the bed.

Liv clung passionately to Daemon, their lips locking. He slipped out of his loose trousers smoothly, lifting her legs as he moved into position, skilled and sure.

His muscular, sturdy thigh moved between her legs, and the head of his erection naturally brushed against her intimate area.

“I’ll give it all to you—just take it,” Daemon murmured, smiling slyly as he greedily sucked on her lips. “Even if you spit it out, I’ll thrust it right back in.”

Already wet from his foreplay, Liv’s body welcomed him. Parting the tightly closed flesh, his thick, firm length plunged in deeply in a single thrust.

“Ah!”

“Haa…”

His heavy testicles slapped against her. Daemon drove himself in mercilessly to the base, his brows furrowing as he let out a short breath. The warmth and tight grip of her inner walls seemed to overwhelm him with intense stimulation.

Liv was no exception to the overwhelming sensations caused by the fullness inside her. The deepest, most sensitive spot was pressed firmly, sending a piercing wave of pleasure that shot through her body, all the way to the top of her head. Her thighs trembled, and the intensity of the feeling left her mind blank, as though it had been completely washed white.

“Hng, ahh…”

Breathless, Liv let out a sound somewhere between a sob and a moan, tears welling in her eyes, blurring her vision.

She twisted her waist, trying to catch her breath, but Daemon growled a warning, his hand pressing her hip down.

“Don’t squeeze.”

“I wasn’t…”

“You’re clenching this tightly and still denying it?”

The shaft that had completely filled her slowly withdrew. The movement of it brushing against her inner walls was so vivid, so explicit, that she could clearly picture it in her mind.

“Not very convincing.”

With those tightly spoken words, Daemon, who had nearly pulled out completely, thrust back in all at once. Liv clenched her eyes shut as the exact same spot from before was stimulated again. The clear tears that had gathered at the corners of her eyes slid down her temples.

Daemon gave her no time to catch her breath, resuming his movements immediately. The strong, rough force striking below shook her entire body.

“Aah, haa!”

“Hah.”

The wet, sloshing sounds disturbed her ears. The sensation of hot water gushing up from below was overwhelming.

Liv’s legs kept trying to close as she felt the uncontrollable pleasure crashing through her, the obscene mess of her juices soaking her thighs. But her wide-open legs couldn’t budge, leaving her most intimate parts completely exposed to the sharp stimulation.

“Ah, ah, aah!”

“Hah.”

Unable to suppress her rising moans, Liv opened her mouth wide—it was the only way she could manage to breathe.

Daemon, who had been intensely thrusting, took the opportunity to suck on her tongue, loosening his rhythm below just a little.

“Mmph.”

He sucked hard enough to make her tongue ache, then suddenly picked up speed with his hips. His forceful thrusts hammered against her inner walls, pinning her beneath his weight. The heat in her perineum, which was continuously rubbed, swelled with each pounding movement.

Liv, unable to handle the overwhelming sensations, wrapped her arms tightly around his body. Her tense fingers scratched at his shoulder blades.

“Please, ha, Daemon…”

She whimpered, biting his sweat-slicked neck. The salty taste mingled with something faintly metallic, spreading across her tongue.

“…Damn you…”

Daemon muttered a low curse, but Liv couldn’t comprehend his words. Her mind, melted by pleasure, had no room for anything else. All she could do was bite, trying desperately to release the heat that wouldn’t dissipate.

As she clung to him, her arms wrapped tightly around his sweat-soaked back, Liv suddenly felt her body shudder. The hard thrusts that had been stirring her insides came to a stop, his cock twitching deep within her.

And then, he released. She could feel it—the hot, thick spurts of semen being pumped deep inside her. The force of it was so intense she could feel the pulsing all the way down to the base.

“Ugh…”

Daemon emptied himself, not spilling a single drop outside. He stayed buried in her, holding her close, even after he finished, as if preserving the warmth.

Pinned helplessly beneath his heavy body, Liv let her limbs fall limp, her breath ragged. She couldn’t move an inch—there wasn’t any strength left in her.

The pounding of a heartbeat, perhaps his, perhaps hers, echoed in her ears.

“Ah.”

Daemon, who had seemed like he would never move, finally lifted his upper body. As he did, his thick member slipped out, and the cloudy white cum he had released began to dribble out of her.

Liv lay there, still breathless, watching her sweat-slick belly rise and fall. Daemon looked down at her, then shifted his gaze to his own manhood. Though it had softened slightly after such an intense release, it still stood impressively, veins prominent.

The head and shaft were glistening, smeared with a mixture of their fluids.

Licking his lower lip, Daemon moved his eyes to Liv’s still-gaping enterance. His cum was smeared around her flushed entrance, dripping slowly.

The sight was enough to evaporate whatever rationality he had left.

“…What?”

Liv, still lost in the haze of her climax, glanced down. Between her legs, Daemon’ hand was rubbing her wet clit and lips.

“You said you wanted it all, but you’re spilling it like this.”

“This is…”

“No matter.”

Daemon smeared the leaking fluid back inside her, repositioning himself. Her overworked, swollen entrance welcomed him back in effortlessly.

“I’ll just fill you up again.”

Grabbing her hips, Daemon began moving once more. Soon, the heat and pleasure filled the entire bedroom.

 



 

The bed beneath her was damp, her body sticky.

Compared to the times they’d rolled around breaking furniture at the Adelinde mansion, this was tame. But unlike Adelinde, this was a hotel—they’d have to leave the cleanup to the hotel staff, not their own servants. The room was in complete disarray.

During the act, Liv had climaxed countless times, eventually releasing clear fluid between her legs. The sight of her squirting made Daemon lose his mind all over again, leading to repeated thrusting and climaxing.

She even felt bloated, her stomach uncomfortably full. Her lips and the roof of her mouth were parched from all the panting and moaning.

The initial passion, when she had scratched his back and neck, felt like a distant memory. Now, completely drained, Liv couldn’t even lift a finger.

The problem was that she wasn’t the only one exhausted.

“Looks like it’s poking out.”

Daemon’ voice carried a hint of relaxation, thanks to the multiple climaxes. He pressed down gently on Liv’s lower stomach, making her already full insides tighten even more. Reflexively, Liv let out a faint moan, her hand reaching for her belly.

She tried to push Daemon’ hand away, but instead, he caught her hand and placed it over the spot he had just pressed.

“Here, right?”

“Why…”

Why was there something so firm beneath her skin?

Normally soft, her lower stomach now had a strange, solid bulge. She could only assume it was…

“Aren’t you tired?”

“Didn’t we already test my stamina at Adelinde?”

Back then, she had been caught up in her emotions, staying entwined with him day and night. But wasn’t this different?

There was much she wanted to say, but she lacked the energy. Liv ended up answering with an exhausted sigh. Daemon, unfazed by her fatigue, continued caressing her sweat-drenched body.

Each time his hand touched her, a chill ran through her overly sensitive body. She was too tired to react, but her heightened senses made it impossible to ignore his touch.

“We can’t roll around like we did at Adelinde—not with the trial schedule.”

He spoke as if to explain why he was being even more relentless now, though to Liv, it made no sense.

It was clear she couldn’t stop him, so she tried a different approach.

“I’m thirsty.”

Her voice was so faint that she doubted he heard her, but Daemon responded immediately.

He withdrew the menacingly forceful thrusts of his member without hesitation and climbed off the bed. It seemed he intended to fetch the water himself.

Well, a person should have some sense of decency, at least.

Relieved at the brief respite, Liv turned her head toward Daemon. His scarred back bore fresh scratches from their recent sex.

Seeing the marks she’d left on him filled her with a mix of embarrassment and a strange satisfaction. As she slowly sat up, her cheeks flushed with color.

 Daemon returned to the bed with a glass of water, completely naked.

Despite his body glistening with fluids and marked with a reddish hue, he still looked impressive. Liv found herself staring at him, captivated. For a moment, she thought she understood why he had admired her own nakedness.

Of course, her body could never be as perfect as his.

“Thank you.”

Liv accepted the glass and averted her eyes. She noticed Daemon’ long legs beside her, his muscular thighs, and below that, his knee. During sex, she had never paid much attention to his legs, but now, she saw an enormous scar there.

The scars on his torso were all grim, but the long tear across his knee looked particularly ghastly. It must have been a terrible wound to leave such a large scar after so long.

Daemon noticed where her gaze had landed and sighed softly.

“Ah.”

Unlike the other scars, for which he’d immediately provided stories, he didn’t explain this one. He stared down at his knee, his brows furrowed, and his eyes held a distinct sadness.

“You don’t have to tell me about it.”

Though Liv was curious, she didn’t want to pry. Daemon had been trying so hard to share as much of himself as he could. They had only just begun to truly face each other, and she didn’t want to ruin it by being too greedy.

Daemon narrowed his eyes at her words, then, after some hesitation, began speaking slowly.

“My last battle.”

His voice was different from before, no longer the detached tone of someone recounting a distant event. Instead, it was as if he were describing something that had happened just yesterday, his tone strained and heavy.

“…It must have been a serious injury.”

“They said that if treatment had been delayed even a little, I wouldn’t have been able to walk. But I recovered well, considering.”

Although he still carried a cane, he could manage daily life without much difficulty—that alone was a miracle. Liv stared at the scar on his knee, feeling that there must be more behind it than just a bad injury. But she couldn’t bring herself to ask for the full story.

Noticing her hesitation, Daemon smirked.

“If I tell you, will it earn me your pity?”

“I told you, I—”

“It was an operation to raid the enemy camp.”

Daemon began to speak, his tone casual.

“The village was burning, bombs had fallen, and all that remained were the bodies of refugees.”

Liv’s eyes widened in shock. Though she had never been near a battlefield, she at least knew that soldiers weren’t supposed to harm civilians.

“Why…?”

“The commander wanted glory and acted on faulty intelligence. It was a trap, and we got ambushed instead. The aide to that foolish commander took the blame for not properly supporting him and resigned.”

Daemon’ explanation was simple, but the magnitude of the event was anything but. Liv could easily imagine that the omitted parts were filled with complexity.

He had said it was his last battle. Then perhaps the aide who resigned was…

“It happened right before I quit working for that idiot. Everything turned to ashes.”

Clicking his tongue, Daemon glanced at the glass in Liv’s hand. She emptied it at his unspoken urging, and he took the empty glass, placing it on the side table.

Daemon’ hand smoothly wrapped around her waist, making his intentions clear. He wanted to continue what they had paused, but Liv couldn’t easily let herself be swept away again.

“I feel like I made you remember something painful.”

“If that’s how you feel, then pity me. Better yet, stay by my side and take care of me.”

Murmuring indifferently, Daemon buried his face against Liv’s neck. He licked her skin slowly, sucking on it until his cool body warmed up again.

The time for pleasure wasn’t over yet.

 



 

Stephan thought Daemon had stolen his glory.

He had always pushed Daemon into the most dangerous battlefields, but suddenly decided to lead an army himself, desperate for recognition. Having seen Daemon repeatedly earn accolades, Stephan assumed he could achieve the same if he just went to the front lines.

By the time Daemon learned that Stephan had taken soldiers to raid the enemy, it was too late.

Stephan had brutally crushed the village as if to terrify the enemy. When Daemon arrived with the second wave, he found pools of blood, an unbearable stench, and burning buildings.

Stephan, who had almost no real battle experience, was ecstatic after the one-sided slaughter, and the soldiers were convinced they’d killed disguised enemies. They thought their attack had been flawless, and that was why there had been no resistance.

But the problem didn’t end there. The real enemy soon attacked those drunk on victory. Only then did Stephan realize the gravity of his mistake.

 

“Daemon! Protect me! We need reinforcements!”

 

Stephan barely escaped with Daemon’ help, but rather than calling for reinforcements, he hid at the safe rear base for days, strengthening their defenses. He even stopped Daemon from going to help the trapped soldiers, ordering him to stay and protect him instead.

In the end, the isolated soldiers were annihilated, and Stephan’s mistake and the defeat were blamed entirely on Daemon.

The last battle was the most shameful and horrible one Daemon had ever fought. He should have killed Stephan and made it look like an accident. It would have been better to save even one more soldier than protect such a useless commander.

The consequences of that moment’s wrong decision were too severe. It was around then that Daemon began to suffer from the crawling sensations all over his body. He started having nightmares filled with screams and blood, hallucinations that plagued him every night.

“…mus.”

Whenever his knee ached for no reason, the nightmares were even worse. Even the sleeping pills didn’t help on those nights.

“…Daemon.”

Life had lost its meaning. Losing his purpose overnight was bad enough, but Daemon had also lost his will to live. Wandering from one battlefield to another, he eventually found himself forcibly confined to a quiet countryside, a life that made him feel even more powerless. He lived under the weight of that monotonous peace.

No, it had been monotonous, but now it was a little different.

“Daemon!”

With a start, Daemon opened his eyes to the dark room. He could faintly hear the sound of rain outside.

It had been a long time since he had felt like he was truly waking up. His sleep had mostly been a series of shallow naps, interrupted by sudden jolts as if burned by fire.

Daemon glanced to his side. He felt warmth—the body of another person, whom he unconsciously held tightly.

“Are you alright?”

Liv was looking at him with worried eyes. Though the room was dim, she was close enough that he could clearly see her expression.

She was worried about him.

Worried?

Was he dreaming? Daemon gently brushed aside Liv’s hair that had fallen over her forehead. The sensation under his fingers told him that this moment was real.

Liv, briefly flustered by his sudden touch, awkwardly lowered her head.

“You seemed to be having a nightmare, so I woke you.”

“…I see.”

For Daemon, it was nothing unusual, but it seemed it was different for Liv. In Buerno, he had slept peacefully with her by his side, and in Adelinde, he hadn’t slept deeply enough to have nightmares. This was the first time she had seen what his nights were truly like.

He had never shown his vulnerable side to anyone before. Even after reuniting with Liv, he had no intention of revealing this part of himself to her.

But now, at this moment, Daemon instinctively realized that his instability could be of use to him.

“That’s why I always take the pills.”

“Is it a side effect?”

“It’s been this way ever since I was discharged, so probably.”

Liv’s face darkened further. Daemon barely managed to suppress a smile. She was so tender-hearted—he couldn’t let her go. He had to keep her close, lest she scatter her kindness where it wasn’t appreciated.

“But I never saw this in Buerno.”

“I was at peace with you by my side.”

Since it wasn’t entirely a lie, the words flowed easily.

“And now?”

“I must have had a nightmare because I was reminded of the past. But as long as you stay by my side like this, I’ll be fine.”

His words implied that without her, his nights would always be like this. Normally, Liv might have thought he was exaggerating, but having just witnessed his nightmare, she nodded seriously.

“Will that really be enough?”

Daemon couldn’t hold back his rising emotions any longer and pulled her into a tight embrace. Her face was pressed into his firm chest, and though she wriggled uncomfortably, he didn’t relax his grip. He kissed the top of her head lightly, murmuring in a low voice.

“That’s enough for me.”

Daemon had a feeling that if he fell asleep now, he would finally get a good few hours of rest.

And when he woke up, Liv would still be there by his side.

He was sure of it.

 Suddenly, alongside the news about Marquis Dietrion that had popped up out of nowhere, Liv’s story began to be added. Although they managed to keep her name out of it, there was no telling how long that would last. Information about Liv could easily be discovered by simply listening in Buerno’s streets.

‘No, honestly, it’s best if there are no rumors at all.’

Liv sighed as she placed the newspaper back on the stand and started walking slowly. Today, Daemon had gone to court. He had looked like he wanted her to wait for him at the hotel, but Liv, having spent enough time lounging around the hotel room, firmly chose to go out.

When she left the hotel, she didn’t have a specific destination in mind. But once she was on the street, her steps naturally carried her somewhere.

Although the appearance of some shops and buildings had changed, the layout of the city and the shape of its streets remained the same. Liv reached her destination without getting lost. It was a building where her parents’ old workshop used to be.

The workshop from her memories no longer existed. Instead, a small flower shop occupied the space. Liv stood still, gazing at the neatly arranged exterior of the shop before turning away with a wistful expression. Not far from there was a modest house from her childhood.

Before long, she reached the house. Unlike the workshop, the house remained almost unchanged. The low fence covered with ivy, the narrow front yard hardly worthy of being called a garden, and the somewhat low two-story building with its faded roof.

Liv approached the house with a sigh of nostalgia. She wanted to look inside, but a glance through the window showed signs of someone currently living there.

She quickly pulled herself together and stepped back, knowing it wasn’t polite to loiter around someone else’s home. But the ripples in her heart didn’t settle easily. Childhood memories she had long forgotten resurfaced vividly—her parents smiling warmly at her, her carefree self growing up with no worries, days she thought would always be happy.

The time she spent with Corida now was just as precious…

“What are you doing here?”

It was as Liv sat down to rest on a bench in the small park where she used to play, having wandered around the neighborhood in a daze, that a tall man approached her.

Lost in old memories, Liv only realized how much time had passed when she saw him.

“Is the trial already over?”

“For today,” Daemon replied indifferently as he glanced around, seemingly trying to figure out what Liv had been doing.

“This is the neighborhood I used to live in.”

“The neighborhood you used to live in?”

“Back when my parents were alive.”

Hearing the nostalgia in her voice, Daemon quietly gazed at her. Liv looked around the park with a curious expression before suddenly smiling at him.

“Would you like me to show you around?”

Seeing Daemon nod casually, Liv quickly stood up.

She then led him to the house she used to live in, the alleys she played in, the streets she frequented, and even the site where the workshop used to be. Daemon didn’t particularly engage in conversation, but Liv seemed animated just showing him the places from her past.

“You remember everything, even from so long ago.”

“Of course, I remember it all.”

As she smiled and looked at the distant flower shop, Daemon spoke slowly, his eyes fixed on her profile.

“How do you think it would have been if you had continued to grow up so sheltered?”

“Sheltered?”

“If both your parents were still alive and you were still living here without any worries.”

Surprised by the unexpected question, Liv’s eyes widened.

She remained silent, contemplating Daemon’ question, then tilted her head slightly. If she had grown up sheltered…

If she had returned home after graduation to find her family still stable, continuing a happy life in the capital with her parents, never having to struggle alone to care for Corida.

“I think I would have been happy.”

Daemon narrowed his eyes. He had noticed the wistful look on her face as she answered. He never longed for any part of his past. He didn’t wish to go back, nor did he feel joy when reminiscing about it.

But Liv seemed like she would go back to that time in a heartbeat if given the chance.

The thought displeased him. He was about to say something when Liv spoke first.

“But if that were the case, I wouldn’t have what I have now.”

“Now?”

“Yes. Didn’t I tell you before? I only met you because I didn’t grow up sheltered.”

Liv awkwardly smiled. It was a smile tinged with embarrassment and bashfulness.

Daemon, forgetting his earlier displeasure, quietly watched her smile and then spoke in a low voice, “Are you happy now?”

The question, asked in a stiff tone, carried a hint of tension. Liv, noticing the subtle shift in his demeanor, looked at him with a curious expression before her smile deepened.

“Isn’t it too early to say?”

“No.”

Daemon answered quickly and took hold of her arm, as if to keep her from leaving for those happy memories.

“It’s a very astute conclusion.”

 



 

Liv knew more about the capital than Daemon did.

Of course, the information she remembered wasn’t always accurate, but many of the old restaurants and notable places still stood. So she took it upon herself to show Daemon around. Introducing him to the places of her happy past or recreating similar moments brought her joy.

Thanks to Daemon, who accompanied her without complaint, Liv was able to do as she pleased without hesitation for the first time in a while. Even when the newspapers began reporting stories about the woman standing beside Marquis Dietrion, she remained unconcerned.

As she and Daemon visited more places in the capital, the rumors surrounding them seemed to fade into irrelevance. What people said about them no longer mattered.

“I always stopped in front of that candy shop. I got scolded by my parents every time.”

“You liked candy?”

“It’s sweet and delicious.”

To a young girl, the candy shop had been a grand, magical place. Now, as an adult, it was just a small, old shop, but back then, the sweet aroma wafting from it was enchanting.

“It seems giving you candy for practice was a good choice.”

Liv, who had been staring nostalgically at the old wooden sign of the candy shop, looked at Daemon in surprise. Blinking, she replayed his words in her mind before her face flushed.

Practice candy. The memory of their first kiss, which had been under the guise of teaching her how to smoke a cigar, flashed through her mind.

“…I didn’t eat it.”

“You didn’t?”

“It’s probably still in the house in Buerno.”

Daemon frowned at her response. Feeling embarrassed, Liv averted her gaze and tried to change the subject.

“You don’t even eat candy, so why did you keep it in your drawer?”

Back then, she had been too overwhelmed to think much of it, but in hindsight, it was curious. Daemon never seemed interested in sweets or snacks—the kind of things children would like.

Daemon pressed his lips into a thin line at her question. It wasn’t a difficult question, but he didn’t answer right away, prompting Liv to study his expression with a suspicious look.

“…Was it someone else’s snack?”

She asked the question without much hope, not really believing it. Daemon’ expression twisted into a visible scowl.

“Why would someone else’s snack be in my drawer?”

Judging by his disgusted face, he wasn’t lying. Then why did he have candy in his drawer?

“They say sweets are good for coaxing people.”

“…What?”

“You were quite stiff, like a child who hadn’t grown up yet.”

Daemon replied nonchalantly, as if the hesitation earlier had been a figment of her imagination.

“I thought maybe giving you something sweet might help you relax.”

In other words, he had prepared it intentionally to lure her. Liv had suspected Daemon of using various tricks, but hearing that even something so trivial had been planned was strange. She let out a hollow laugh and shook her head.

“I’m not the kind of girl who would follow just because of candy.”

“If I recall, that candy worked quite well.”

“…It wasn’t the candy that worked.”

It was the unexpected kiss before she received the candy—their first kiss, heavy with the scent of cigars.

Daemon seemed to guess the rest of her unspoken words, the corner of his mouth quirking slightly.

“I didn’t think you’d prefer the smell of cigars.”

“I’m not a child, after all.”

“You don’t need to keep emphasizing that.”

Daemon gently held her chin and lowered his head without hesitation. He paid no mind to any journalists or photographers who might be secretly watching them.

“It’s a good thing you’re not a child. Otherwise, I wouldn’t be able to do this.”

Liv’s lips curved into a small smile, but that smile was soon swallowed up by Daemon.

 To be honest, Liv couldn’t fully relax.

Though the fear that she’d run away the moment he looked away had lessened, Daemon still wasn’t comfortable leaving her unattended. Even though Roman and others were assigned as her guards, it wasn’t enough for him.

These feelings grew stronger the more days they spent exploring the capital together, with Liv showing him around. Their relationship had improved recently, and Liv was smiling more often, which made Daemon want to spend more time with her, if only to witness her bright expressions.

However, despite his desires, Daemon still had responsibilities. While he and Liv roamed the capital so openly, Luzia, seething with frustration, was becoming an ever-growing nuisance. She had no idea that Daemon was secretly negotiating with the Malte family, and instead clung to the hope that her family would back her in her efforts to tarnish the reputation of Daemon and Liv.

In truth, he had been preoccupied with dealing with Luzia’s desperate final attempts to bring them down.

Even so…

“Eleonore?”

He was just now hearing that brat had come to the capital?

Daemon’ eyes shot a fierce glare at Charles, who flinched under the pressure. They were in the courtroom, with proceedings still ongoing. This wasn’t the time for personal conversation, but Charles had been keenly aware that delivering this news immediately was the only way to avoid a greater wrath later. He glanced nervously at those around them as he gave his report.

Despite Charles’ best efforts, Daemon gave him a look of unfiltered disapproval.

Camille had come to the capital—and it didn’t take much thought to guess who he would be meeting.

Daemon ground his teeth.

His fingers fidgeted with his pocket watch, betraying his irritation.

 



 

As Daemon had predicted, Camille had found Liv.

Today, Liv had planned to rest comfortably at the hotel instead of going out. She was taken aback when she ran into Camille in the lobby. She’d thought it possible they might meet again someday, but she hadn’t expected it to be so soon.

Since there were things she needed to discuss with him, Liv greeted Camille readily. Seeing her reaction, Roman found a quiet shop where they could speak without drawing attention. He then asked for permission to keep watch over the two. Liv nodded understandingly at his request.

With Liv’s consent, Camille had no choice but to accept, though he wasn’t pleased about it.

Thus, Liv found herself seated across from Camille.

“I didn’t think we’d meet again like this,” Liv began, fiddling with her teacup.

“First, I want to apologize. You helped me, and it ended up putting you in an awkward position. I never imagined things would escalate as much as they did.”

Camille shook his head at Liv’s words, full of guilt. “It was awkward, yes, but not entirely unfounded. After all, I did court you, Teacher Rodaise.”

“Teacher Marcel…”

“Honestly, I expected to see you sooner. I was so surprised when I heard you were in the capital.”

Camille took a sip of his tea, his voice calm.

“You never made it to Arburn, did you?”

“I appreciate all you did, but circumstances turned out like this. I’m ashamed.”

Liv felt even guiltier seeing Camille’s unexpectedly gentle response. To Camille, this entire situation must have seemed absurd. She had left, determined to escape Daemon, but now she was in the capital, openly entangled in rumors with him. Camille’s efforts had amounted to nothing, and he had even been burdened with a tainted reputation because of her.

He had every right to be angry and accuse her of playing him.

“In fact, I have a small villa in Arburn. That’s why I wanted you to go there… but adding a bit of ulterior motive backfired on me quite badly.”

Camille shrugged with a wry smile, letting out a shallow sigh, which made Liv’s face grow even more serious.

“Were you put in a difficult position because of me? If there’s anything I can do to help…”

“Can I be frank with you?”

Camille frowned slightly and spoke in a playful tone, “If you took my hand right now and ran away with me, I’d feel like all my troubles had been repaid.”

Liv’s expression froze awkwardly. Seeing her reaction, Camille smiled, seemingly unsurprised, and lifted his teacup.

He had been in Buerno, witnessing firsthand the rage Daemon unleashed after Liv ran away. Knowing he shared similar feelings, Camille understood Daemon’ motives all too well. If Liv were to flee again, this time, Daemon might very well break her legs and confine her in his mansion.

Yet, even so, if Liv wanted to run away again, Camille wouldn’t be unprepared like before.

“There’s something I’d like to ask—would you answer me?”

“If it’s a question I can answer.”

After a brief pause, Camille spoke in a low voice, “Is being with him your choice, Teacher Rodaise?”

Despite stern rebukes from his family, Camille had come all the way to the capital to confirm something: hearing that Liv was seen with Daemon, seemingly on good terms, he feared she was being forced to act.

Now that Camille understood the depth of Daemon’ obsession with her, he knew his family’s influence could be used for a more thorough intervention this time. In Buerno, they had underestimated Daemon, unaware of what he was truly capable of.

But the Eleonore family wasn’t one to accept disgrace twice. If Liv was being used for one of Daemon’ schemes, then helping her escape again could serve as a way to retaliate against him.

Liv blinked slowly at Camille’s question. There was a hint of embarrassment in her faint smile—almost like a laugh, almost like she might cry. But her answer was resolute.

“Yes. It’s my choice.”

Liv lowered her gaze to her teacup, her voice softening.

“I want to stay by his side.”

The hope that had briefly shone in Camille’s eyes faded. Suppressing a sigh, he forced a smile and nodded.

“…He’s still good to you, then, Teacher Rodaise.”

“Though perhaps not to you, Teacher Marcel.”

“To me, he’s quite awful.”

Camille’s playful tone seemed like an attempt to lighten the heavy mood, and Liv gave a small smile, trying to respond in kind.

“Liv.”

At the sound of her name called in a gruff voice, Liv’s expression brightened immediately. It wasn’t a conscious reaction—it was instinctual. Camille’s smile faded as he turned to look behind him.

The man approaching them, his black coat fluttering as he walked, had fierce eyes that flashed at Camille. They were eyes filled with jealousy and distrust—eyes Camille had seen enough of in Buerno. He never thought he’d see that look on the face of Marquis Dietrion.

“Ah, you’ve come straight from court, haven’t you?”

The look that had been filled with malice turned soft the moment it shifted to Liv.

“What’s going on here?”

“As you can see, I ran into Teacher Marcel by chance and was having a conversation.”

Liv answered calmly, acting as though she hadn’t noticed Daemon’ sharp demeanor. Camille, watching her, showed a look of surprise.

Even if Liv cared for Daemon, that was different from not being afraid of him.

But instead of looking afraid, Liv seemed perfectly comfortable as she sat there. Daemon strode over to her.

“I’m sure I’ve already told you about the rumors involving this man.”

“Yes. He got caught up in rumors because of me, so I should apologize for that.”

Daemon scoffed loudly and glanced at Camille. “He got involved for his own benefit, and he chose to be part of the gossip.”

Daemon made no attempt to hide his wariness toward Camille, his hostility blatant. Camille, seeing that, gave up on being polite and smiled faintly.

“I have no interest in receiving an apology from Teacher Rodaise. If anyone should apologize, it’s you, Marquis Dietrion. You acted on impulse and ruined my reputation.”

“You should blame your lack of judgment for meddling in someone else’s business.”

“I simply responded to a request from someone I cared for.”

“This foolish brat…”

A soft sigh interrupted their heated exchange. Then, a gentle voice followed.

“Daemon, please sit down. I’ll ask for some tea.”

Camille, who had been about to show more resistance, looked at Liv with wide eyes. Even more surprising was Daemon’ reaction to being addressed by name.

“We can have tea somewhere else.”

“Then just sit down for a moment. We should finish our conversation. Let’s wrap this up, and then we can go somewhere else for tea.”

“Tsk.”

The arrogant, cold, and sharp-tempered man, tamed like a beast that had been trained.

 
Camille, unable to hide his astonishment, watched Daemon take a seat beside Liv.

Even when Camille first heard about Liv and Daemon’s reunion, he hadn’t felt this wronged. Was this man really the same fierce figure who had once threatened him so openly?

Despite seeing Camille’s face, which clearly showed his feelings, Daemon shamelessly faced him. His attitude made it clear he intended to listen in on whatever conversation Liv and Camille had. It was thoroughly impolite, but pointing it out wouldn’t make him budge.

Camille let out a hollow laugh, muttering under his breath, “I’d love to show everyone in Buerno this scene. They’d be shocked.”

“Whether they are or not is none of my concern.”

“Then why even…”

The question lingered on Camille’s tongue—why make such a big fuss if this was how it was going to end? But what good would it do to ask? Whether he got an answer or not, the result wouldn’t change.

To Camille, who still remembered Liv asking for help with a tired, lifeless face, Daemon’s behavior was despicable. He wanted to pick a fight just for the sake of it.

Sensing Camille’s lingering resentment, Liv hurriedly tried to wrap up their conversation.

“In any case, I’m truly sorry, and thank you. If you ever need my help, I’ll do my best to be of assistance.”

“There’s no need for thanks. Knowing you’re well is enough for me. That was my reason for coming to the capital, after all.”

Daemon frowned at Camille’s response. But perhaps due to Liv’s effort to conclude the meeting, he didn’t pick apart Camille’s words. Anyone who knew Daemon would have been shocked by his restraint.

Ignoring the look from Daemon that clearly told him to leave, Camille kept his gaze on Liv.

“And if you ever need help, Teacher Rodaise, please contact me.”

Camille pulled a card from his pocket, his contact details printed on it, and slid it toward Liv.

“I promise, I’ll do it perfectly the second time.”

“No, I…”

“If I stay longer, I’ll end up dead in the middle of the capital. I should be going.”

Ignoring the fierce glare from Daemon until the very end, Camille picked up his hat and stood, giving Liv a cheerful smile.

Just as he seemed about to leave, he hesitated, turning back to Liv with an expression that suggested he had more to say. Liv looked puzzled.

Seeing Camille’s hesitation, Daemon’s face twisted, and he opened his mouth to speak. But Camille spoke first.

“I fell for you at first sight, Teacher Rodaise.”

“Pardon?”

“I just wanted you to know.”

Daemon answered on behalf of the stunned Liv, his voice icy, “That’s rude and improper, Lord Eleonore.”

“Well, I’ve been wronged, so I think I deserve this much rudeness.”

“You’ve never heard the stories of those who’ve flirted with someone else’s lover and vanished without a trace, have you?”

“She’s just your lover—who knows what the future holds? There’s no harm in dreaming.”

With an annoyingly bright smile, Camille gave his farewell.

“Until we meet again, Teacher Rodaise.”

Perhaps feeling the true danger to his life this time, Camille left quickly. Liv watched him leave in a daze, her gaze following him as he hurried out of the shop. Then, instinctively, she grabbed the arm of the man standing next to her.

“No.”

“…What?”

“No kidnapping, no assault, no imprisonment—nothing.”

As soon as the words left her mouth, Liv wondered if she’d gone too far with such extreme examples. But Daemon’s silence made her realize her request was more realistic than she’d thought.

Watching Daemon’s displeased expression as he pressed his lips together, Liv hesitantly asked, “Were you really planning to commit a crime?”

“This place is unpleasant. Let’s leave.”

Dodging the question, Daemon suddenly reached across the table. He picked up the contact card Camille had left behind and crumpled it, dropping it into a half-filled teacup. The ink quickly blurred, the letters smudging beyond recognition.

Destroying the contact card did little to ease his mood. Still looking as if he could shoot Camille on sight, Daemon clutched his cane tightly.

Liv understood his anger. She imagined if their positions were reversed—if she saw Daemon being pursued by another woman right in front of her—she’d certainly be furious. But she couldn’t just let it go, knowing Camille’s life might genuinely be in danger.

Daemon had both the power and the disregard for social rules to harm Camille without consequence.

Liv sighed. She had only intended to apologize to Camille, but somehow she had ended up stoking Daemon’s anger. Despite her guilt toward Camille, she had no intention of maintaining any connection with him.

“I won’t be seeing Teacher Marcel again.”

Liv quickly clarified, and Daemon scoffed.

“Obviously,” he replied curtly, his eyes still fixed on the spot where Camille had exited. Suddenly, Daemon turned to Liv.

“The same goes for me.”

“What do you mean?”

“Falling for you at first sight.”

Liv’s green eyes widened. Daemon held her gaze, his tone cold and detached as he continued, “I fell for you before he did.”

 



 

After meeting with Camille, Daemon’s behavior became a bit odd.

It wasn’t that he had become suddenly more aggressive or excessively affectionate. Rather, he often stared at Liv in silence, lost in thought, as if grappling with something internally. At first, Liv wondered if he was contemplating what to do about Camille, but since he didn’t seem particularly violent, she assumed it must be something else. She asked him subtly a few times, but he never gave a clear answer.

Could it be about the ongoing court case?

In the dim light of early dawn, Liv gazed at the sleeping face of Daemon, pondering what could be on his mind that he wouldn’t share.

Daemon had been open with her about his background and past—something that symbolized his desire to keep no secrets from her and to show how close they had become. She couldn’t imagine him suddenly creating a new secret between them now.

The court case seemed the most likely reason.

What had started as front-page news—the scandal involving Marquis Dietrion and Lady Malte—had since faded, overtaken by new courtly romances. Liv, who had been keeping track of the trial through the newspapers, found it unfortunate.

Had something changed in the trial, now that public interest had waned?

As her mind wandered, a soft groan reached her ears.

“Ugh…”

Daemon’s once peaceful face twisted in discomfort. His breathing grew harsh and uneven, his clenched jaw showing the strain. Sweat glistened on his forehead. Liv quickly reached out to gently pat his chest. She could feel his heart pounding, muscles tense beneath her hand.

She wasn’t sure how effective her actions were, but if she didn’t do this, Daemon would wake in a panic and be unable to return to sleep. So Liv tried her best to soothe him, careful not to wake him.

Fortunately, her efforts weren’t entirely in vain. Ever since Liv began attentively caring for his nightmares, they had begun to lessen, albeit gradually.

Daemon could now sleep for a few hours without medication, holding Liv close. For several nights, Liv had taken on the task of calming his nightmares before allowing herself to sleep.

If her actions were futile, perhaps she would have stopped. But since she could see the results, she couldn’t bring herself to abandon her efforts.

Besides, she felt a strange sense of comfort while patting Daemon’s chest.

 

“As long as you stay by my side like this, I’ll be fine.”

 

This was the most certain way for Liv to know that she mattered to Daemon. Of course, he now openly expressed his affection for her in any setting, but…

It might seem a little morbid, but Liv took a quiet satisfaction in secretly affirming her importance to him this way. Seeing Daemon calm only under her touch filled her with a deep sense of contentment.

 

“That’s enough for me.”

 

It brought her joy to know she could do something for this seemingly complete man.

His bed always belonged to her, and she alone was the one who could see him sleep. Therefore, she was the only one who could soothe Daemon’s nightmares in the future—the only one.

As her steady pats continued, Daemon’s harsh breaths gradually evened out. The trembling of his lashes subsided, and the lines on his face relaxed.

Carefully, Liv withdrew her hand and wiped the sweat from his forehead, then planted a gentle kiss on his cheek. He remained asleep, his breathing steady.

Smiling softly, Liv settled into his embrace. Even in his sleep, he pulled her close.

Suddenly, his teasing words echoed in her mind.

 

“The same goes for me. Falling for you at first sight.”

 

Drowsy and slipping into sleep, Liv murmured in response, “Me too.”

From the moment they first met in the Pendance mansion’s drawing room, she couldn’t help but be captivated by this beautiful man. From the moment she first looked into his cold blue eyes, she had fallen helplessly to her knees.

Now she finally admitted it.

 News spread that a new Gratia had been elected unanimously. As everyone had anticipated, it was Cardinal Calliope.

Around the same time, the trial involving Marquis Dietrion and Lady Malte finally drew to a close. Lady Malte, who had been attending the proceedings out of spite, eventually began sending a representative, and their fervor had notably subsided. On the day of the final hearing, both sides were represented by delegates, and a swift verdict was reached.

The tumultuous trial concluded with the Malte family agreeing to pay a settlement to Marquis Dietrion. In terms of amount, it was mostly symbolic, and those in the know suspected that the real agreement between the two families had been made outside the courtroom.

Shortly afterward, rumors spread that Lady Malte, tarnished by scandal, had voluntarily entered a convent to atone for her misdeeds.

 



 

Although the trial was over, Daemon and Liv couldn’t leave the capital right away, as visitors seeking Daemon’s attention kept coming without a break.

Daemon was not one to warmly welcome visitors under normal circumstances. Yet, for some reason, he selectively met those who sought him out. Though he privately complained about the nuisance, he wasn’t as dismissive as he had been in the past.

With Daemon occupied by numerous visitors, Liv found herself with more free time. However, touring the capital alone wasn’t appealing, especially since she had become something of a public figure due to her association with Daemon. In the midst of all this, Liv started to worry about Corida, who was still in Adelinde.

When Liv had traveled to the capital, Thierry had stayed behind to watch over Corida. Knowing that someone capable of taking immediate action if Corida’s condition worsened was there had reassured Liv. Since arriving in the capital, they had exchanged letters frequently.

According to Corida’s letters, she was living peacefully. She found it difficult to establish a study routine without Adolf’s help, but she was adapting on her own. Moreover, she had made friends in the neighborhood, which kept her busier than expected, and she seemed happy.

Still, written words could easily mask the truth. Perhaps Corida was downplaying her struggles so as not to worry Liv.

Liv’s days with Daemon were indeed joyful and comfortable, but she felt it was time to return.

“Adelinde, you say?”

When Liv brought up her intention, Charles and Adolf exchanged uneasy glances. She had purposely broached the subject with the aides before bringing it to Daemon, and sure enough, they looked quite troubled.

“Would it be possible to wait just a bit longer until the Marquis has finished his business here?”

Charles, who had been busy tidying up after Daemon during his time in Adelinde, looked especially distraught.

“No one will stop you from going to your sister, but if you leave now, the Marquis will undoubtedly cancel all his engagements… and these matters need closure.”

Liv tilted her head slightly, considering Charles’s words before asking calmly, “When business here is finished, would I be able to stay in Adelinde?”

“Pardon?”

“If I can’t go anywhere alone, wherever I stay will be where he stays, correct?”

“That’s…”

Charles couldn’t bring himself to say no. It was clear, even without asking, that he envisioned life at the mansion in Adelinde.

Seeing Charles struggle to respond, Liv, who seemed to want to say more, fell silent. After becoming Daemon’s implied partner, they had yet to discuss their future plans.

Marquis Dietrion’s family estate was in Buerno. Daemon had once said he had lived there ever since completing his military service. To Liv, Buerno seemed like the natural place for Daemon to return to.

So what about Liv? Having grown used to a nomadic life, Liv could easily adapt to living anywhere. However, now she wanted to return to Adelinde for Corida’s sake, as Corida had set her sights on entering the girls’ school there.

The distance between Buerno and Adelinde was considerable. Daemon would certainly refuse to live apart from Liv, meaning that if she stayed in Adelinde, he would stay there too.

“On that note…”

Adolf, who had been deep in thought beside them, spoke cautiously, “Once Miss Corida gets into the Adelinde girls’ school, she’ll be staying in the dormitory, right? In that case, there wouldn’t be much reason for you to remain in Adelinde.”

While Liv was in the capital, the date for the entrance exam had drawn closer. If Corida passed and entered the school, she would live in the dormitory. Though Liv wasn’t entirely familiar with the school’s rules, most boarding schools strictly regulated outings.

But that was only if Corida passed the exam as planned.

“She might not pass.”

“Oh, there’s no need to worry about that!”

Adolf responded quickly, his face brightening.

“Now that the trial is over, I plan to go to Adelinde soon to help Miss Corida study. I promised her I would.”

“Won’t that be too much trouble for you?”

“Haha, it’s fine. I took responsibility for this, so I intend to see it through. And, if it’s alright with you, I would like to continue supporting Miss Corida in the future.”

Liv’s eyes widened at the unexpected statement. Adolf chuckled kindly and added, “We’ve grown close over time, and I’d like to offer more meaningful support. Besides, Miss Corida seems to have inherited her parents’ talents.”

Looking at Adolf, who clarified that his help was more of an investment than a favor, Liv felt a mix of emotions. Having a benefactor would ease Liv’s burden of being Corida’s sole guardian. In the past, she might have been wary and suspicious, but now she mostly felt grateful and relieved.

Feeling her heart lighten, Liv smiled awkwardly. She had no intention of rejecting Adolf’s offer.

It seemed that she wanted to be with Daemon, just as he was willing to follow her wherever she chose to stay.

 



 

Liv decided to stay in Adelinde until Corida’s entrance exam. Since it wouldn’t be for long, she persuaded Daemon to let her go alone.

“Must you go alone?”

“Yes.”

“…Really?”

“I don’t want my plans to disrupt yours.”

The timing of the exam coincided with when Daemon would finish his affairs in the capital, making it unavoidable.

“Adolf will be with me, and Dr. Gertrude is at the mansion in Adelinde.”

“Fine, and I’ll go with you.”

“There must have been a reason for all your meetings here. Please don’t cancel everything just because of me.”

Hearing Liv’s firm words, Daemon’s face twisted in displeasure. “Didn’t I tell you that I don’t mind?”

“I’m not trying to manipulate you. I don’t want us to have that kind of relationship.”

Daemon remained silent, clearly unhappy, and took a drag from his cigar. Through the faint, spreading smoke, his face looked particularly pale.

He smoked the entire cigar without saying a word. While he wrestled with his emotions, Liv sat quietly, waiting for him.

Finally, Daemon stubbed out his cigar in the ashtray and spoke slowly, “My insomnia still hasn’t been cured.”

“I know.”

“It’ll worsen again if you’re not here.”

It almost sounded like a threat—a refusal to sleep. It was a blatant display of his reluctance to be apart, and Liv found herself smiling without realizing it.

“I just need to see Corida settle into school.”

She meant it. She wanted to see Corida in good health, witness her enter the boarding school, and feel she had truly let her sister become independent. Only then could she fully devote herself to Daemon. How unfair it would be if she couldn’t focus entirely on him because she couldn’t let go of Corida.

“Afterward, I’ll return to the Langess mansion. So, will you wait for me?”

Liv carefully approached Daemon, cupping his cheek and meeting his gaze. His blue eyes, as cold as ice, looked back at her, but they didn’t frighten her.

“I’m not used to waiting, so…”

Daemon wrapped his arm around Liv’s waist, drawing her closer.

“You must return before the roses in the Langess mansion’s garden wither.”

The scent of his cigar mingled with the heat of his kiss, leaving a lingering reminder in her mouth—a memory she fully embraced.

 The bustling talk of the Cardinal’s visit and the scandal involving the great noble families had all become a thing of the past, and Buerno had regained its tranquility.

The rain that had soaked the ground for days finally ceased, giving way to a clear sky and warm sunshine. A cool breeze flowed in through the half-open window. Standing by the window, Daemon took a deep breath. He loosely held a half-burned cigar as his gaze lingered on the scenery outside.

“Marquis.”

Daemon, who had seemed like he would stare endlessly outside, turned at the call.

“Word has come that the item is ready. You can check it whenever you wish. And Curator Aaron has contacted us again, asking for another chance. Shall I cut him off this time?”

Aaron was the curator of Royven, Buerno’s largest art gallery, and once handled all of Daemon’ art dealings. He had also been the one to subtly pass information about Daemon to Camille.

Under normal circumstances, Daemon would have dealt with him promptly, but this time he chose instead to sever all dealings with Aaron and establish new partnerships. Daemon was capable of turning an insignificant shop into an impressive gallery if he chose the right person to nurture.

The art industry in Buerno had grown significantly due to Daemon’ bold and abundant investments. The rapid expansion over the past few years still heavily relied on his support.

Royven, which initially managed to hold on after all transactions were halted, soon realized its limits and bowed down, desperately pleading for another opportunity.

“Do they want to close down the only gallery they have left?”

Charles immediately caught the irritation laced in Daemon’ drowsy tone and responded at once, “I’ll warn them.”

“What about the artists?”

“I’ve compiled a list.”

Charles handed a thick stack of papers to Daemon. It was a report detailing the personal information of various artists.

Daemon passed the cigar he was holding to Charles and took the papers, glancing through them disinterestedly. They were all highly qualified, with one common trait—a specialty in portraiture.

After skimming through the papers, Daemon selected a few names, folding the corners of their pages before handing them back to Charles.

“Let’s visit the gallery first.”

“I’ll have the carriage ready immediately.”

After confirming Charles had left, Daemon turned his head back to the window.

Bright green leaves glittered in the sunlight, and vibrant red roses covered the garden.

Surely she wouldn’t decide not to return.

“I’ll move the item to the exhibit you mentioned,” the gallery curator said nervously, his voice taut with tension. Daemon gave him a perfunctory nod and habitually opened his cigar case. Despite his calm exterior, his thoughts were in turmoil.

The test results should have been released by now.

If he had known this, he would have gone to Adelinde himself.

At the very least, he should have had Adolf verify the results in person and bring her back.

Adolf had returned to Buerno before the results of the Adelinde girls’ school entrance exam were announced. There were other tasks that required his attention, and now that Daemon had also returned, Adolf was needed to assist him. Naturally, Philip accompanied Daemon, and Roman traveled between Adelinde and Buerno for his duties.

Thierry was the only one of Daemon’ aides left in Adelinde.

What if she had changed her mind?

What if this time she was deceiving Thierry to buy time?

“Marquis?”

Charles looked at Daemon in confusion, seeing him lost in thought with an unlit cigar in his hand. Daemon turned around at his questioning gaze. When they had first returned from the capital to Buerno, his state hadn’t been this severe.

Up until now, he had never doubted Thierry. But after Thierry became close to Corida… it became hard to trust him unconditionally. It might be groundless suspicion, but once the thought took hold, it lingered.

He remembered how Corida disapproved of him.

Corida was Liv’s only family. She wasn’t just the most influential person in Liv’s life but also the one who could draw out unpredictable actions.

And what about me?

When Liv had come to the capital to see him, Daemon had felt somewhat assured of her feelings. He had seen Liv Rodaise smile sweetly, initiate kisses, recount old memories, and worry about his nightmares each night.

But now that they were apart, the confidence he had gained in the capital was rapidly fading. The fact that she had chosen to return to Adelinde for her sister’s exam spoke volumes. Knowing how deeply Liv cared for her sister, Daemon couldn’t bring himself to force her to stay.

To be honest, he had been slightly confident he could endure their separation while in the capital. If he had known that his confidence would disappear so quickly, he would have tried harder to evoke Liv’s sympathy.

How important and valuable was he compared to her sister?

‘I was complacent.’

He should have had her sign legally binding documents.

With that thought, Daemon let out a sigh, his lips curling into a crooked frown.

Even if she ran, he could simply bring her back. In the past, he had believed that just confining her physically was enough, but now he couldn’t bear the thought of seeing Liv’s indifferent gaze upon him. Her coldness during their time at the Adelinde estate lingered in his memory, constantly fueling his anxiety.

As much as he considered himself foolish, he couldn’t shake off these irrational thoughts. Especially as the roses in the Langess mansion’s garden bloomed more each day.

And today, he had found rose petals scattered across the garden floor. Perhaps it was due to the heavy rains that had fallen for some time, causing the petals to fall prematurely. Seeing the scattered petals had put him in a gloomy mood.

Daemon quickened his pace, leaving the gallery. The thought of the fallen rose petals made him anxious again, and he bit the end of his unlit cigar.

“The artists you selected have been summoned.”

“Let’s go immediately.”

No matter what thoughts occupied his mind, outwardly, he remained the sensitive and difficult Marquis Dietrion. Just as Daemon was about to board the carriage, a servant who had been given separate instructions appeared, his arms full of something.

Charles’s expression shifted subtly as he noticed the servant. Clearing his throat, he directed a question into the open carriage door.

“And, uh… where should we put these items?”

Daemon’s gaze turned to the servant. Narrowing his eyes, he responded in an indifferent tone, “Store them in one of the vacant mansions.”

“Should we refurbish the old studio in the mansion that was previously closed?”

Charles was referring to the place once opened for Brad’s nude painting sessions. Daemon’s face immediately hardened.

“Somewhere else.”

It was a location that Luzia’s followers had discovered. Naturally, he had no intention of using it again.

“Find a smaller place, but make sure it’s secure.”

“Understood.”

Charles nodded resolutely, taking Daemon’s insistence that the location should be hard to notice even on private property seriously. Still, Charles kept glancing at the items the servant was holding, as if he couldn’t believe what he was seeing.

Regardless of Charles’s reaction, Daemon averted his gaze indifferently. Whether Charles believed it or not, the art supplies the servant had brought were for Daemon’s own use.

And now, he was on his way to choose the teacher who would instruct him in painting.

 



 

In truth, there was a rational and justifiable reason behind this seemingly outlandish decision.

Daemon had decided to paint more portraits of Liv. However, he couldn’t let an outside artist paint nude portraits of her—a simple portrait, perhaps, but not that.

So, the only solution was to paint her himself.

Even in the midst of his anxiety about whether she would come back, he had reached such an audacious conclusion. Thus, he had ordered his aides to prepare art supplies and a studio and to find him a painting instructor.

The artist before him now was the result of his aides faithfully carrying out those instructions.

“W-well… creating work at this level from the beginning is…”

The artist looked flustered, trailing off after seeing the example Daemon had presented.

“That’s why I’m asking you to teach me.”

“…Have you ever learned to paint before?”

“Of course not.”

But he was a quick learner in anything he pursued, and with the right instructor, he was confident he could improve quickly.

Seeing the determination in Daemon’s eyes, the artist wiped his forehead with a handkerchief, offering an awkward smile. His shoulders, tense from nervousness, began to slump further.

“Well, um, then perhaps we should assess your basic skills first and then discuss how to proceed…”

“Are you suggesting a test?”

Dare you?

The unsaid reprimand was clear enough that the artist’s face turned pale. He seemed on the verge of fainting, struggling to find where to look.

At this rate, it seemed impossible for the artist to teach Daemon—they could barely carry on a conversation.

 The terrified artist left the drawing room, his shoulders slumped. Watching him depart, guided by a servant, Charles let out a sigh. Every artist who spoke with Daemon seemed to leave in exactly the same way—disheartened and defeated.

“Bring in the next one.”

“That was the last one.”

“The last?”

Daemon raised an eyebrow. The artists had all mumbled something similar to what the previous one had said before being dismissed. Their interactions were so brief that Daemon had no idea how many he’d seen.

Was that really all of them?

Daemon clicked his tongue, glancing at the discarded list. He wanted to learn the technique quickly, but he couldn’t waste time on teachers who couldn’t even articulate their methods properly. He couldn’t expect to find someone as sharp and capable as Liv.

“Bring me another list. This time, make sure they’re more competent.”

“Uh, yes, understood.”

Charles opened his mouth as if to say more but then gave a resigned nod.

Another day had ended without much success. As dusk settled over the Langess estate, the still-blooming roses greeted Daemon upon his return.

Was it just his imagination? There seemed to be more petals scattered on the ground compared to the morning. It felt like they might all wither soon, leaving behind only bare branches.

With a tense face, Daemon turned away from the garden.

Liv hadn’t come today, either.

 



 

After much difficulty, Daemon finally hired an art teacher. This one had immediately grasped that what Daemon wanted wasn’t “overall improvement in artistic skills” but the ability to create a particular type of artwork.

The studio was set up in one of the smaller villas on Daemon’s private estate, a place that had rarely been used before. With the studio, materials, and teacher all perfectly prepared, Daemon began his lessons in earnest.

But even with all the conditions perfectly in place, progress was not guaranteed.

“Yes, that’s a fine shape you’ve drawn.”

“For a creature, maybe.”

“Well… even when depicting mythical beings, it’s helpful to use human forms as reference…”

“This isn’t a myth; it’s a real human.”

“Oh…”

The art teacher was often left speechless, struggling to find a positive interpretation of the situation.

But unfortunately, Daemon wasn’t a fool. He quickly realized that having a good eye for art was entirely different from having artistic talent—something that became painfully clear within a few days. As long as he had eyes, he couldn’t ignore the stark difference between his and the teacher’s results. Though he didn’t want to admit it, they looked at the same thing but produced very different outcomes.

Eventually, a frustrated mutter escaped Daemon’s lips.

“I don’t understand.”

Since his cadet days, Daemon had been skilled with weapons, and he had excelled academically. He had steady hands and a sharp mind—so why couldn’t he produce results?

Scowling, Daemon glared at the canvas. If his gaze could cut, the canvas would have been shredded by now.

The art teacher, watching Daemon with an exasperated expression, swallowed a sigh. Treating him like a child learning to walk, the teacher forced a smile and patiently went over the basics again.

By the time they had circled back to the first day’s material, the lesson was over.

The art teacher left the villa with a face that looked almost relieved—like a prisoner freed from a dungeon. Daemon briefly considered firing him, simply because he found the man’s expression distasteful. But for now, he decided against it. He had painstakingly sifted through many artists to find this one, and if he dismissed him now, he’d have to endure the tedious process all over again.

His mood had already been on a downward trajectory lately; he had no desire to add more frustrating tasks.

More than anything, why were his hands like this?

Even after the teacher left, Daemon remained seated in front of the canvas. He had intended to draw Liv from memory, but sadly, what he ended up with wasn’t even recognizably human—it was geometric shapes. And even calling it geometric was generous. It was more like a chaotic tangle of lines.

His memory wasn’t the problem. Was it his hands that were failing him? It was absurd that he couldn’t control his hands properly.

Proper technique mattered in any craft. Could it be that the teacher had taught him incorrectly from the start?

Deep in serious thought, Daemon didn’t notice someone approaching from behind until he heard footsteps. Someone had come to fetch him from the villa after the art teacher had left.

“Wait outside.”

Without turning around, Daemon gave a curt command, carefully moving the brush in his hand. He intended to draw a straight line, but what emerged was a slightly crooked diagonal.

…Maybe it was the tools that were the problem.

“I’ll have to replace the materials.”

Even if one could use any type of gun, there was always a particular one that suited best. The same must be true for art supplies.

So, he’d replace the brush, and if that didn’t work, the canvas, and if that still didn’t work…

“Won’t it be the same, no matter what you change?”

Suddenly, a voice spoke up, and a hand reached over Daemon’s shoulder, taking the brush from his grip. The wet tip pressed against the canvas, drawing a clean, straight line.

“I don’t know much about art supplies, but they all look quite luxurious to me.”

Daemon looked up at the familiar voice. The person who had been looking at the canvas with a slight smile turned their gaze to him—eyes as green as lush foliage and lips curved into a soft smile.

“I never would have believed it if I hadn’t seen it with my own eyes.”

“…Liv.”

“That you’d pick up a hobby like this.”

Liv’s smile widened, and the sight was so dazzling that Daemon found himself questioning whether she was real or an illusion. Considering he had been thinking about her endlessly just moments ago, it wouldn’t be surprising if this were a hallucination.

Seeing Daemon standing still, not even blinking, Liv’s smile began to fade.

Watching his expression, she spoke in a gentle, calm voice, “The roses at the Langess mansion haven’t withered yet. So you can’t say I’m late.”

“…Half of them have fallen.”

“Oh, you’re exaggerating. I just saw them myself.”

She had seen them herself, meaning she had visited the Langess mansion before coming here. It was an inefficient route, considering Daemon would soon be returning to the mansion. She could have just waited there comfortably instead of coming all the way out here.

Noticing the confusion in Daemon’s eyes, Liv gave an awkward smile.

“I thought about waiting at the mansion, but…”

Pausing, she glanced away, looking somewhat embarrassed.

“It took longer to get here than I expected.”

“What do you mean?”

“I mean it took me longer than I thought to come here.”

“Be more specific.”

Daemon, who had been dazed, quickly regained his composure. Fixing his gaze on Liv, he insisted on an answer.

“Liv.”

Liv, who had been stalling, hesitantly opened her mouth.

“I wanted to see you sooner.”

It was hard to say it at first, but once she did, the rest came more easily. Her face flushed, but her voice was clear.

“I missed you, Daemon.”

Ah, that was enough.

Daemon wrapped his arm around Liv’s waist, pulling her close.

No matter how clean the studio was kept, the smell of paint lingered.

Perhaps because of that, Liv’s pale body reminded him of a canvas. Her flushed skin seemed like it had absorbed color—like wet paint blending with warm breaths and saliva.

The painting he had tried to create was a mess, but the body beneath him was utterly beautiful.

It couldn’t be more perfect. Whether her skin was pale or flushed with excitement, everything about her was flawless. With a low sigh, Daemon gripped Liv’s ankle.

When he slowly rubbed her ankle bone with his thumb, her thighs quivered, and her body grew wet in anticipation of what was to come. Just looking at her soaked arousal made Daemon’s own excitement swell.
The head of Daemon’s penis rubbed slowly against Liv’s entrance. As the heated tip made contact with her sensitive spot, a low moan escaped from Liv’s lips.

“Mmh…”

Although Daemon wanted to thrust inside her all at once, he instead positioned his glistening tip at her entrance, moving slowly. The slight tightening sensation at the end of his penis was already giving him intense pleasure.

Perhaps it was because it had been a while since their last time. If he acted on his instincts, it felt like he would climax as soon as he thrust inside. Even now, it was hard to suppress the force coursing through him, enough to make his veins bulge. Gritting his teeth, he kept the tip of his penis at the entrance, unmoving.

Perhaps confused by this, Liv, who had been squeezing her eyes shut in anticipation of the full sensation to come, called out to Daemon in a trembling voice.

“Daemon?”

A deep wrinkle formed on Daemon’s forehead in response. Just the sound of his name in her frail voice nearly pushed him to a shameful climax.

But, despite his effort to hold back, Liv pulled him toward her, her legs coming together as she did.

“Daemon…”

She moved her hips in a pleading manner, her sticky legs wrapping around Daemon’s waist as if begging him to enter her. Daemon, who had been gazing down at Liv with a twisted look in his eyes, finally leaned forward with a fierce motion.

His muscular upper body completely covered her slender frame. At the same time, his hips thrust downward powerfully. Liv, startled by the force even though she was the one pulling him in, hurriedly wrapped her arms around Daemon’s neck and shrank back.

Her tight, slick inner walls clenched around his penis. From the tip, which pressed into her deepest part, hot semen gushed forth. The pleasure that seared through his mind made him lose all reason.

What remained after that was pure instinct. Even as he was still ejaculating, his thrusts began again, rough and relentless. Flesh slapped against flesh, and body fluids drenched both of them.

The thrusts were so forceful that Liv’s body was pushed up repeatedly. Daemon gathered her back into his arms, biting into her neck.

Leaving marks on her tender skin was all too easy. Daemon seemed intent on making her body as flushed and marked as the rose petals scattered across the garden floor. Each time he sucked at her skin, she struggled and trembled in his embrace, her every movement only endearing her to him more.

No matter what his lips were doing, the thrusts below continued unyieldingly. The rubbing at the point of contact caused frothy, white fluid to form, creating an obscene sound.

“Mmh…”

His panting breaths grew more labored, and finally, his arousal reached its peak. As his thighs, swollen with tension, flexed, his frenzied hips jerked to a stop, trembling slightly.

Daemon once again filled her already overflowing insides with his seed. As if he wouldn’t let a single drop escape, he didn’t withdraw until his ejaculation ended completely.

Liv, who had reached her own climax, was barely able to catch her breath, crushed beneath his large body. Her lips parted, but all she could do was gasp weakly. Daemon leaned down and kissed her open mouth, sliding his tongue inside.

Only after a long, sticky kiss did his still-moving penis finally calm down. As he slowly separated their bodies, the slick organ, covered in opaque fluid, withdrew inch by inch. Liv’s hips trembled at the sensation of it dragging against her inner walls.

White fluid trickled out from her open entrance. Seeing this, Daemon tilted his head slightly, squinting.

“Ha, what are you doing…?”

“What do you think?”

With a lazy voice, Daemon pressed his thick thumb against his own semen, pushing it back inside.

“I’m putting it back where it belongs.”

Perhaps it was the lingering effects of his climax; his voice, always sharp and cutting, was now languid.

Caught up in their passionate lovemaking, Liv gazed at Daemon as if entranced, tears still welling in her eyes. Her eyes shone particularly brightly, likely because the pleasure had yet to fade, leaving her flushed.

“…Do you know?”

“Know what?”

“How beautiful you are.”

It wasn’t just an impulsive comment born of brief excitement and euphoria.

Even before, Liv would often stare blankly at Daemon. Though Daemon had long been aware of her gaze, hearing such open admiration now left him feeling strangely renewed. He lifted the corners of his lips.

Lost in pleasure, his flushed face made even his smile look different. Normally, it would have seemed cold and mocking, but now it was nothing short of a seductive smile that stirred a woman’s heart. Liv’s cheeks turned a deep red.

Liv reached out, her hand gliding over his still-slick chest, abdomen, and waist. Her touch clearly carried intent.

Daemon eagerly responded to her invitation.

 



 

By the time they finally pulled themselves together, the sun had already set.

It had been a while since they last moved so intensely, and their entire bodies ached. But stronger than the dull pain was the hunger that gnawed at them. It was no wonder that their stomachs kept growling in succession.

“I asked for something simple to be brought over, so just hang on a bit longer.”

Daemon seemed to believe that Liv couldn’t wait until they returned to the mansion for dinner. Liv tried to protest that she wasn’t that hungry, but when her stomach growled again, she just gave up.

She was indeed hungry, and since the servants had already been ordered, arguing now would just cause more trouble for everyone.

As they waited for the servants to bring food, Liv took the opportunity to explore the villa.

Or more accurately, she explored the work that Daemon had been doing here. Daemon lay lazily, propped up on his elbow, silently watching her. He showed no intention of stopping her.

“A small villa isn’t so bad.”

Liv, lingering in the area where Daemon had been working earlier, turned to look at him.

“Wherever you are is within my sight, so in some ways, it’s much better.”

Originally, this villa had been intended for another purpose, but it seemed that Daemon’s idea of its use had shifted. Seeing his contented expression, Liv let out a small laugh before resuming her exploration.

“This isn’t your first time starting today, is it?”

Just by looking at the state of the art supplies and the pile of papers in the corner, it was clear this wasn’t Daemon’s first drawing lesson. Liv, with a curious look, began leafing through the stack of sheets filled with lines that gave no clue as to what they were supposed to depict.

Looking at a single page didn’t give her any sense of the work, but comparing several pieces side by side, she could feel that the lines were striving for something specific.

Not just basic practice lines to build drawing skills, but lines that aimed to form something complete.

“What are you trying to draw?”

“You.”

His answer was confident and without a hint of embarrassment.

Liv instinctively looked back at the paper she held.

“…Me?”

“Yes.”

So this… ‘collection of circles, squares, and wavy, scattered lines’ was supposed to be her.

Even to someone with no expertise in art like Liv, the drawing was too… abstract to understand.

Seeing Liv struggle to say anything further, Daemon muttered in a cynical tone, “I know it’s terrible. I’m trying to figure out why.”

Figure out why? Did it really need such a grand explanation? Maybe he just didn’t have the talent for it. Had he lived his life so well that he couldn’t grasp the concept of ‘lack of talent’?

Liv swallowed her unspoken words, offering a slightly awkward smile as she set the paper down.

Even if she couldn’t believe that the drawing was supposed to be her, the fact that Daemon was so devoted to her that he’d do something so out of character just to capture her was a pleasant surprise. She even found it endearing to see him so earnestly trying to pinpoint why he couldn’t draw.

“You could just leave it to a skilled artist.”

“No one else will ever draw your nude portrait again. No one but me.”

At Daemon’s resolute words, Liv finally let out a small laugh. Even his inability to let go of the idea of her nude portrait seemed adorable—a sign that she, too, was quite far gone.

“Can I join these lessons too?”

“What?”

“There’s a picture I want to create, and listening to you, it seems better if I draw it myself than have someone else do it.”

The light in Daemon’s blue eyes shifted. He clearly understood what drawing she was referring to. However, he stared at her, as if asking her to be more explicit. Just as he often did when asking her to clarify her indirect words.

“Will you model for me?”

“…If it’s you, I’ll allow a nude portrait.”

He said ‘allow,’ but it sounded more like he was requesting it. Unable to contain his rekindled desire, Daemon pounced on Liv once again.

In the end, the food that the servants had brought turned cold while they rolled around, but of course, neither of them cared.

 Daemon no longer spent his time endlessly gazing down at the garden of the Langess mansion. There was no need for it. Now that Liv had returned to his side, the person who was the focal point of his daily life, he expected nothing but peaceful and tranquil days ahead.

However, life wasn’t always so accommodating, and recently, something else had been agitating him. It was the art lessons he had been taking. While attending these lessons alone had been less than enjoyable, having Liv join as a new student had made his displeasure sink to an even deeper level.

Today was no different. Daemon’s expression was nothing short of glacial as he exited the villa after the lesson.

Sitting with his chin resting in his hand, Daemon stared out at the rapidly passing scenery outside the carriage window and muttered to himself, “I should fire him.”

The carriage had already been filled with a heavy silence, as Daemon’s mood was more irritable than usual. No one in the carriage had missed his low mutter.

Having spoken so abruptly, Daemon pressed his lips together in a straight line, lost in thought once again. Charles, sitting across from him and watching his master’s grim expression, finally couldn’t hold back his question.

“…Are you saying we need to find a new teacher?”

“There are better artists out there.”

Not having attended the lessons himself, Charles couldn’t accurately guess the exact cause of Daemon’s foul mood.

Daemon was not the kind of boss to kindly explain the context of his discontent, so Charles’s gaze naturally turned to Liv, who was seated beside Daemon.

If anyone could provide an objective view of the situation, it would be her. Furthermore, if Daemon’s displeasure was just a matter of personal mood, Liv might be able to convince him otherwise. She was sensible enough to understand just how inefficient, bothersome, and time-consuming it would be to find a new art teacher.

Liv, catching Charles’s blatant and desperate look, gave an awkward smile before turning to Daemon.

“But having artistic talent and being a good teacher aren’t necessarily the same thing.”

“Indeed, Miss Rodaise, you have experience teaching students, so you would know best!”

So Daemon’s dissatisfaction with the art teacher wasn’t about their skill. It was just his own mercurial, demanding nature causing the trouble again!

Since there was likely no artist who could endure Daemon’s temperament, Charles hoped to avoid adding more tasks by supporting Liv’s argument.

With a beaming expression, Charles immediately praised her, but Liv furrowed her brow with a sheepish look.

“I don’t have enough experience to evaluate someone else’s teaching skills…”

“If the young lady of the Pendance family followed you around like a duckling, there’s no doubt about your ability to teach.”

Daemon, who had been silent after making his blunt statement, suddenly interjected. His voice carried not the slightest hesitation as he praised Liv. In contrast, Liv herself blushed slightly, clearly embarrassed.

“…Please, it’s ‘young lady,’ not ‘duckling.'”

Was that her way of accepting his compliment about her teaching skills?

Charles thought that perhaps Liv, after spending so much time with Daemon, was slowly becoming as brazen as him. With that thought in mind, Charles turned back to his master.

“In any case… Miss Rodaise seems to be satisfied with the current teacher. What should we do?”

At Charles’s subtle question, Daemon frowned. It was the usual expression he wore whenever he was about to lose his temper.

Was it too much to expect that a single word from Liv could overcome Daemon’s exacting nature? Charles, feeling anxious, was about to add, ‘I’ll find a new artist,’ when Daemon spoke up.

“Leave it be.”

Charles widened his eyes in surprise, but Daemon, clearly annoyed by his reaction, turned his head back to the window. Resting his chin on his hand and staring outside, he looked like nothing more than a sulking child.

Sitting beside him, Liv quietly watched Daemon before speaking softly, “Is it because of me that you don’t like him?”

“I didn’t like him from the start.”

It was as if he was trying to deny being so petty.

However, even to Charles, who knew nothing of the details, it was clear that Daemon was behaving pettily. Whatever the reason, Liv was undoubtedly involved in it.

And sure enough, Liv’s gentle words that followed confirmed Charles’s suspicions.

“He’s a teacher. When teaching, it’s common to give praise to boost the student’s confidence. There’s nothing personal behind it.”

It turned out that Daemon was irritated simply because the art teacher had complimented Liv!

Surely he wasn’t jealous just because someone else had given her praise? Most likely, he was unhappy about the atmosphere between Liv and the teacher when compliments were exchanged. Charles was well aware of how possessive and jealous Daemon could be—it was evident just from the vast collection of art pieces he hoarded.

And this was Liv Rodaise they were talking about. Daemon would glare at anyone who so much as spoke a word to her, so it was no surprise that things would end poorly if someone complimented her in his presence. Perhaps for the sake of the art teacher, it would be better to let him go.

While Charles was genuinely concerned for the art teacher’s well-being, Liv continued speaking with a calm demeanor.

“Besides, everyone knows about our relationship. At least here in Buerno, no one would dare flirt with me at the risk of offending you.”

Charles nearly nodded in agreement, given that it was his hard work that had spread those very rumors. In Buerno, Liv was known first and foremost as Daemon’s mistress, and to alter that perception, Charles had gone to great lengths.

The fact that Daemon had gone so far as to engage in a public trial against Malte for Liv was straightforward enough to communicate. But their first meeting and the development of their romance needed to be spun into a more appealing narrative for the public. Charles couldn’t even remember how many sleepless nights he and Adolf had spent weaving a convincing love story by blending fact with fiction.

As Charles reminisced with tears welling up in his eyes, he heard Daemon’s sardonic response.

“Just a lover.”

‘Just a lover!’ Charles fumed internally. That ‘lover’ title had been so painstakingly earned!

Had his master already forgotten the chaos of searching for Liv when she fled, or the aftermath of the trial and the challenges of returning to Buerno? All the sweat and tears his subordinates had poured into achieving this outcome!

Though a sense of injustice swelled within him, Charles swallowed his emotions. Instead, he continued thinking about the poor art teacher who had ended up on the wrong side of his irritable boss.

“Are you still thinking about Teacher Marcel’s comments?”

Charles, who had been contemplating how to warn the art teacher about the danger to his life, looked at Liv in shock.

On top of bringing up the art teacher, she now mentioned Camille Eleonore! Did she not realize how much Daemon despised Camille, who had once helped her try to escape?

“Ignoring advice leads to undesirable outcomes.”

“I doubt Teacher Marcel intended anything like that. His words didn’t strike me as realistic.”

“Of course not, because what he wants will never happen.”

Daemon replied arrogantly, casting a glance out the window to check their surroundings.

“We’re here.”

The speeding carriage gradually slowed until it came to a gentle stop. Liv, who had been so focused on Daemon that she paid no attention to the scenery outside, now looked around in surprise.

“This isn’t the mansion?”

“This is the new gallery currently under renovation. Although there are still many empty spots, I’ve already sent people to set it up, so you can go right in.”

Charles quickly explained, stepping out of the carriage first. Daemon followed, then offered his arm to escort Liv, who was still looking around in confusion.

The new gallery Daemon had purchased and renovated was still missing several pieces. Despite that, it had been decorated lavishly enough that it didn’t feel incomplete.

“Dinner is prepared inside.”

“Aren’t you joining us?”

“My guidance ends here.”

Charles, bidding farewell to the pair heading toward the brightly lit exhibition hall, stepped back. He needed to return and pray with Adolf for tonight’s dinner to go perfectly, hoping that it might alleviate some of his master’s irritability.

 



 

Liv knew that Daemon had multiple galleries.

They housed not just nude works but also other art pieces aligned with his tastes. The scale of these galleries was generally quite large, so it was intriguing to hear about this new place.

Daemon had said nothing as they entered the gallery, pushed along by Charles, so Liv was left to guess its purpose from its exterior.

Perhaps because of his newfound hobby of painting, he had built a gallery for his works? Maybe one or two of Liv’s drawings might be hung beside his.

“This way.”

Since she hadn’t found any clues upon entering, Liv simply followed where Daemon led.

The delicious scent of food wafted through the air, and she assumed they were headed to the dining area when suddenly—

“Oh?”

Liv’s steps halted abruptly. Her gaze fixed on a familiar signature.

“This is…”

“It’s a collection of the works of the Rodaise couple.”

Liv, her eyes trembling as she looked at the pieces on display, turned around. Daemon wore his usual impassive expression.

“I wasn’t sure what to fill the gallery with that you would enjoy.”

 Shortly after his initial statement, Daemon seemed to feel that more explanation was needed and added quietly, “I decided to collect what you were most likely to love.”

Liv looked at Daemon silently. Neither she nor he had ever directly confessed their love for each other. There was no need to say it outright; they shared their feelings fully through their actions.

She preferred seeing his affection reflected in his actions rather than hearing unfamiliar words forced from his lips—like in this very moment.

The gallery itself was touching, but even more heart-fluttering was seeing the man who, while introducing it, appeared so nervous. Liv, unsure what to say, bit her lip to keep her emotions in check.

Daemon seemed to be waiting for Liv’s response, his lips pressed together as he remained silent. But soon, unable to hold back, he spoke again.

“Originally, I intended to gather every piece from across the regions and show you the completed gallery, but I couldn’t afford to wait and miss the right moment.”

His face grew more tense, as if he feared she might be disappointed by this incomplete gallery. Seeing him this way, Liv forced a smile to reassure him.

“The right moment?”

“The moment when everyone would know you are mine.”

Seeing Liv smile, Daemon finally sighed with relief and extended his hand to her. Liv willingly took his arm as they began walking through the gallery.

Some of the pieces were her parents’ works that Liv herself didn’t even know about. Daemon truly seemed determined to collect everything ever created by the Rodaise couple. They had been renowned artisans, with countless clients, and had crafted countless works.

After passing through several gallery rooms, they arrived at a courtyard. It was a dark evening, but the courtyard was brightly lit with beautiful lights. On one side, there was a small artificial pond, and next to it, dinner was prepared just for them. The dishes on the table were still steaming, as if they’d been freshly made.

Just as Liv, who had finally managed to calm her emotions while walking, was about to sit down with a more composed expression—

“The legal procedures are taking longer than expected, so for now, I want to give you this.”

Daemon picked up a box from the table and took out its contents. A ring glistened in his hand.

“Something visible to ease my mind.”

Even without the courtyard lights, the diamond ring seemed as though it would never lose its sparkle, even in the darkness. Daemon slipped the ring onto Liv’s finger as if it had always belonged there—it fit her perfectly.

He paused to gaze at the ring on her hand before cautiously lifting his eyes to meet hers. Considering he’d put the ring on her finger without giving her a choice, his expression wasn’t overly confident or arrogant. Instead, it was almost as if he feared she might take the ring off immediately; he didn’t release her hand.

“Even if it feels overwhelming, think it over again as we explore the gallery before refusing,” he said.

Clearly, he was remembering all the lavish jewelry Liv had rejected, and how she had abandoned them when she tried to escape. Despite having given her exquisite and beautiful things, her complete indifference toward them in the past was now making Daemon uneasy.

It was as if he wanted to prepare something she would surely love, leaving no possibility for rejection. Though, in his impatience, he couldn’t wait for the gallery to be fully completed.

Liv’s lips twisted subtly as she realized the hand that held hers was trembling ever so slightly. She lowered her gaze to the ring’s brilliant shine and slowly spoke.

“I thought I wasn’t the type to care for jewels…”

She raised her free hand and lightly brushed her fingers over the diamond’s surface.

“You might think I’m materialistic, but I’m very happy. I’ve never seen such a beautiful ring in my life. I can’t possibly refuse.”

At her words, Daemon finally regained a bit of his characteristic arrogance. Tilting his chin slightly upward, he responded nonchalantly.

“You’re not materialistic—you’re simply self-aware.”

His tone wasn’t exaggerated or overflowing with emotion. It was as clear as stating an objective fact.

“Flamboyance suits you well.”

Daemon, whose face remained completely composed, had a knack for saying things that could make anyone blush.

Liv let out a small laugh. The tension that had enveloped them both eased considerably.

Completely at ease, Daemon gently pulled Liv into an embrace, whispering softly, “That’s why only you belong by my side.”

His fingers slowly slid between hers, caressing each joint. Realizing how close his breath was, Liv smiled and tightened her grip around his interlocked fingers.

Perhaps he didn’t know—of all the lavish jewelry he had given her, there had never been a ring.

And that was why this ring felt even more special.

It wouldn’t have mattered if it wasn’t a shining diamond but rather a piece of scrap metal or a wildflower picked from the roadside. She would have cherished it just as much.

But there was no need to tell him that—after all, he was hers now.

“Indeed. Flamboyance suits me well, which means being by your side is exactly where I belong.”

Liv embraced the rose she was certain would be beautiful for the rest of her life.

 



 

[I miss you, Corida.

The sunshine in Buerno is very warm. How is it there?

Are you in the midst of preparing for your final exams? I was so surprised to hear that you received a scholarship after your first exam! I’m incredibly proud and happy to be your sister. But I hope you’re not overworking yourself—you know that your health is always the most important thing, right?

I’m glad to hear that dormitory life in Adelinde is suiting you well. Knowing that you’ve made good friends puts my mind at ease. But remember, if you ever have worries, you can always share them with me. Don’t forget that I’m always here for you.

I worry that this reply might be a bit late and make you feel disappointed.

Actually, I’ve been helping Million lately, and I’ve been so exhausted that I fell asleep for days without even having the energy to write you back. It’s not like I’ve taken on a full-time tutoring job again—just giving some occasional advice—but maybe it’s because I haven’t done it for so long that it completely wore me out. How did I used to do this all day long? Even so, it’s been fun working again, and I might continue giving lessons to the young ladies here and there for a while.

Oh, and why did you hang my painting in your dormitory? It’s not good enough to display, so please don’t embarrass your sister like that. Besides, he was quite upset when he found out I sent you the painting. If he learns it’s hanging in your dormitory, he might come to collect it himself. You wouldn’t want that, considering how you feel about him, right?

Anyway, I’m doing well. Come visit Buerno during your break after final exams with your friends. There’s a wonderful place for all of you to stay. A banquet and party will be held there as well!

If you opened the invitation you enclosed with your letter first, then you probably already know what I’m going to write.

Yes, we finally set a date. The wedding will be held right when your break begins. The day after we decided on the date, invitations were already sent out to everyone in Buerno, so there’s no postponing it now. Because of that, there are even people calling me “Marchioness” before we’ve had the wedding!

Corida, if you’re late, you might find yourself meeting me as “Marchioness.” So you must come as soon as your break begins—we need to make our last memories as the Rodaise sisters!

But please don’t think this marriage is forced in any way. I’m so happy right now, and I just want to share that happiness with you. You’ve never quite understood when I tried to tell you how adorable he can be, right? But when you see it for yourself, you’ll understand.

I can’t wait for that day. You’ll see that we’ll become a wonderful family.

That’s all for now, Corida—it’s time for me to go on a date, so I need to wrap this up. Take care and stay healthy for the rest of the semester.]

“Liv?”

Over the gentle scratching sound of the pen, a soft voice called out. The woman, busy writing her letter, turned around. A handsome man in formal wear stood there, leaning on a cane.

“Daemon.”

The woman gave him a gentle smile and swiftly finished her letter.

[See you soon, my beloved sister.

―Always your family, Liv Rodaise.]

With that final black period, the pen’s cap clicked shut. The woman put down the pen and turned to the man, her face radiant with happiness.

The couple left the room, arm in arm. Their figures, walking side by side, grew smaller until they were just a dot, like a period.

 -----

continue in the side stories!!!

 
